Mark Antony - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Early life 
2 Early career and occupation 
3 Service under Caesar Toggle Service under Caesar subsection 
3.1 Gallic wars 
3.2 Civil war 
3.3 Governor of Italy 
3.4 Assassination of Caesar 

3.4.1 Ides of March 

3.4.2 Leader of the Caesarians 

3.4.3 First conflict with Octavian 
4 The Second Triumvirate Toggle The Second Triumvirate subsection 
4.1 Forming the alliance 
4.2 War against the Liberators 
5 Master of the Roman East Toggle Master of the Roman East subsection 
5.1 Division of the republic 
5.2 Activities in the East 
5.3 Fulvias civil war 
5.4 Antonys Parthian War 

5.4.1 RomanParthian relations 

5.4.2 Parthian Invasion 

5.4.3 Conflict with Sextus Pompey 

5.4.4 Reconquest of Judea 

5.4.5 Parthian Campaign 
5.5 Antony and Cleopatra 
5.6 Death 
6 Aftermath and legacy 
7 Marriages and issue 
8 Descendants 
9 Artistic portrayals Toggle Artistic portrayals subsection 
9.1 Novels 
9.2 Poetry 
10 See also 
11 Notes 
12 References Toggle References subsection 
12.1 Citations 
12.2 Primary sources 
12.3 Secondary sources 
13 External links Toggle the table of contents Mark Antony 89 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch  Asturianu Azrbaycanca     Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal  etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Froyskt Franais Frysk Gaeilge Galego    Hrvatski Ido Bahasa Indonesia slenska Italiano  Jawa    Latina Latvieu Lietuvi Magyar  Malagasy    Bahasa Melayu  Nederlands  Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Occitan Ozbekcha    Plattdtsch Polski Portugus Romn   Scots Seeltersk Shqip Simple English Slovenina Slovenina   srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska Tagalog    tatara   Trke   Ting Vit Winaray  Yorb   Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikisource From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Roman politician and general 8330 BC For other people with similar names see Marcus Antonius disambiguation and Marc Anthony disambiguation. Marcus Antonius Flavianera bust of Antony Born 14 January 83 BC Rome Italy Roman Republic Died 1 August 30 BC aged 53 Alexandria Ptolemaic Egypt Cause of death Suicide Resting place Unlocated tomb probably in Egypt Nationality Roman Office Legate under Caesar 5251 BC Plebeian tribune 49 BC Propraetor 49 BC Magister equitum 48 BC Consul 44 BC Proconsul Gaul 4440 BC Triumvir 4333 BC Consul 34 BC Spouses Fadia dates unknown Antonia Hybrida Minor 47 BC Fulvia 4640 BC Octavia Minor 4032 BC Cleopatra 3230 BC Children Antonia Marcus Antonius Antyllus Iullus Antonius Antonia Major Antonia Minor Alexander Helios Cleopatra Selene II Ptolemy Philadelphus Parents Marcus Antonius Creticus and Julia Military career Allegiance Roman Republic Julius Caesar Years 5430 BC Battleswars Gallic Wars Caesars Civil War Battle of Forum Gallorum Battle of Mutina Liberators civil war Antonys Parthian War Antonys campaign against Armenia Battle of Actium Battle of Alexandria Marcus Antonius 14 January 83 BC  1 August 30 BC commonly known in English as Mark Antony1 was a Roman politician and general who played a critical role in the transformation of the Roman Republic from a constitutional republic into the autocratic Roman Empire. Antony was a relative and supporter of Julius Caesar and he served as one of his generals during the conquest of Gaul and the Caesars civil war. Antony was appointed administrator of Italy while Caesar eliminated political opponents in Greece North Africa and Spain. After Caesars assassination in 44 BC Antony joined forces with Lepidus another of Caesars generals and Octavian Caesars greatnephew and adopted son forming a threeman dictatorship known to historians as the Second Triumvirate. The Triumvirs defeated Caesars killers the Liberatores at the Battle of Philippi in 42 BC and divided the government of the Republic between themselves. Antony was assigned Romes eastern provinces including the client kingdom of Egypt then ruled by Cleopatra VII Philopator and was given the command in Romes war against Parthia. Relations among the triumvirs were strained as the various members sought greater political power. Civil war between Antony and Octavian was averted in 40 BC when Antony married Octavians sister Octavia. Despite this marriage Antony carried on a love affair with Cleopatra who bore him three children further straining Antonys relations with Octavian. Lepidus was expelled from the association in 36 BC and in 33 BC disagreements between Antony and Octavian caused a split between the remaining Triumvirs. Their ongoing hostility erupted into civil war in 31 BC when Octavian induced the republic to declare war on Cleopatra and proclaim Antony a traitor. Later that year Antony was defeated by Octavians forces at the Battle of Actium. Antony and Cleopatra fled to Egypt where having again been defeated at the Battle of Alexandria they committed suicide. With Antony dead Octavian became the undisputed master of the Roman world. In 27 BC Octavian was granted the title of Augustus marking the final stage in the transformation of the Roman Republic into an empire with himself as the first Roman emperor. Early lifeedit A member of the plebeian gens Antonia Antony was born in Rome2 on 14 January 83 BC.34 His father and namesake was Marcus Antonius Creticus son of the noted orator Marcus Antonius who had been murdered during the purges of Gaius Marius in the winter of 8786 BC.5 His mother was Julia a third cousin of Julius Caesar. Antony was an infant at the time of Lucius Cornelius Sullas march on Rome in 82 BC.
6 note 1 Antonys brother Lucius on a coin issued at Ephesus during his consulship in 41 BC According to the Roman orator Marcus Tullius Cicero Antonys father was incompetent and corrupt and was only given power because he was incapable of using or abusing it effectively.7 In 74 BC he was given the military command to defeat the pirates of the Mediterranean but he died in Crete in 71 BC without making any significant progress.578 The elder Antonys death left Antony and his brothers Lucius and Gaius in the care of their mother Julia who later married Publius Cornelius Lentulus Sura an eminent member of the old patrician nobility. Lentulus despite exploiting his political success for financial gain was constantly in debt due to his extravagance. He was a major figure in the Catilinarian conspiracy and was summarily executed on the orders of the consul Cicero in 63 BC for his involvement.9 According to the historian Plutarch Antony spent his teenage years wandering through Rome with his brothers and friends gambling drinking and becoming involved in scandalous love affairs.8 Antonys contemporary and enemy Cicero charged that he had a homosexual relationship with Gaius Scribonius Curio.10 This form of slander was popular during this time in the Roman Republic to demean and discredit political opponents.1112 There is little reliable information on his political activity as a young man although it is known that he was an associate of Publius Clodius Pulcher and his street gang.13 He may also have been involved in the Lupercal cult as he was referred to as a priest of this order later in life.14 By age twenty Antony had amassed an enormous debt. Hoping to escape his creditors Antony fled to Greece in 58 BC where he studied philosophy and rhetoric at Athens.citation needed Early career and occupationedit In 57 BC Antony joined the military staff of Aulus Gabinius the Proconsul of Syria as commander of the cavalry.15 This appointment marks the beginning of his military career.16 As consul the previous year Gabinius had consented to the exile of Cicero by Antonys mentor Publius Clodius Pulcher. Hyrcanus II the Romansupported Hasmonean High Priest of Judea fled Jerusalem to Gabinius to seek protection against his rival and soninlaw Alexander. Years earlier in 63 BC the Roman general Pompey had captured him and his father King Aristobulus II during his war against the declining Seleucid Empire. Pompey had deposed Aristobulus and installed Hyrcanus as Romes client ruler over Judea.17 Antony achieved his first military distinctions after securing important victories at Alexandrium and Machaerus.18 With the rebellion defeated by 56 BC Gabinius restored Hyrcanus to his position as High Priest in Judea. Hellenistic bust of Pharaoh Ptolemy XII Auletes. The following year in 55 BC Gabinius intervened in the political affairs of Ptolemaic Egypt. Pharaoh Ptolemy XII Auletes had been deposed in a rebellion led by his daughter Berenice IV in 58 BC forcing him to seek asylum in Rome. During Pompeys conquests years earlier Ptolemy had received the support of Pompey who named him an ally of Rome.19 Gabinius invasion sought to restore Ptolemy to his throne. This was done against the orders of the senate but with the approval of Pompey then Romes leading politician and only after the deposed king provided a 10000 talent bribe. The Greek historian Plutarch records it was Antony who convinced Gabinius to finally act.18 After defeating the frontier forces of the Egyptian kingdom Gabinius army proceeded to attack the palace guards but they surrendered before a battle commenced.20 With Ptolemy XII restored as Romes client king Gabinius garrisoned two thousand Roman soldiers later known as the Gabiniani in Alexandria to ensure Ptolemys authority. In return for its support Rome exercised considerable power over the kingdoms affairs particularly control of the kingdoms revenues and crop yields.21 Antony claimed years later to have first met Cleopatra the then 
14 yearold daughter of Ptolemy XII during this Egyptian campaign.22 While Antony was serving Gabinius in the East the domestic political situation had changed in Rome. In 60 BC a secret agreement known as the First Triumvirate was entered into between three men to control the Republic Marcus Licinius Crassus Gnaeus Pompey Magnus and Gaius Julius Caesar. Crassus Romes wealthiest man had defeated the slave rebellion of Spartacus in 70 BC Pompey conquered much of the Eastern Mediterranean in the 
60 s BC Caesar was Romes pontifex maximus and a former general in Spain. Caesar with funding from Crassus was elected consul for 59 BC to pursue legislation favourable to the allies interests. Caesar for his part was made proconsular governor Illyricum Cisalpine Gaul and Transalpine Gaul for five years. Caesar used his governorship as a launching point for his conquest of free Gaul. Some years later in the midst of a breakdown in the alliance the allies again pursued their interests together in 55 BC Crassus and Pompey were elected consuls in disputed elections and Caesars command was extended for another five years.2324 During his early military service Antony married his cousin Antonia Hybrida Minor the daughter of Gaius Antonius Hybrida. Sometime between 54 and 47 BC the union produced a single known child Antonia. It is unclear if this was Antonys first marriage.note 2 Service under Caesaredit Gallic warsedit See also Gallic Wars The ancient Mediterranean in 50 BC at the end of Caesars Gallic Wars with the territory of Rome in yellow. Antonys association with Publius Clodius Pulcher allowed him to achieve greater prominence. Clodius through the influence of his benefactor Marcus Licinius Crassus had developed a positive political relationship with Julius Caesar. Clodius secured Antony a position on Caesars military staff in 54 BC joining his conquest of Gaul. Serving under Caesar Antony demonstrated excellent military leadership. Despite a temporary alienation later in life Antony and Caesar developed friendly relations which would continue until Caesars assassination in 44 BC. Caesars influence secured greater political advancement for Antony. After a year of service in Gaul Caesar dispatched Antony to Rome to formally begin his political career receiving election as quaestor for 52 BC. Assigned to assist Caesar Antony returned to Gaul and commanded Caesars cavalry during his victory at the Battle of Alesia against the Gallic chieftain Vercingetorix. Following his year in office Antony was made one of Caesars legates and assigned command of two legions approximately 7500 total soldiers.25 Meanwhile the alliance among Caesar Pompey and Crassus had effectively ended. Caesars glory in conquering Gaul had served to further strain his alliance with Pompey26 who having grown jealous of his former ally had drifted away from Caesar and towards Cato and his allies. The domestic political situation in Rome was tense with multiple politicians leading large street gangs. Two important ones were led by Clodius and his rival Titus Annius Milo. In 52 BC with elections unable to be held by the gangs open violence and obstruction from radical tribunes Milo encountered Clodius on a road outside Rome both with entourages which ended with Clodius death. The violent ad hoc funeral held for Clodius resulted in widespread rioting and the destruction of the senate house the curia Hostilia. Elevating Pompey to restore order and hold elections the senate induced his election as sole consul.27 Fully secure in his political position Pompey distanced himself from Caesar over the following years. Antony remained on Caesars military staff until 50 BC helping moppingup actions across Gaul to secure Caesars conquest. With the war largely over Antony was sent back to Rome to act as Caesars protector. With the support of Caesar Antony was appointed to the College of Augurs an important priestly office responsible for interpreting the will of the gods by studying the flight of birds. All public actions required favorable auspices granting the college considerable influence. Antony was then elected as one of the ten plebeian tribunes for 49 BC. In this position Antony could protect Caesar from his political enemies by vetoing actions unfavorable to his patron. Civil waredit See also Caesars Civil War Cato the Younger was one of Caesars chief opponents before the outbreak of the civil war. The feud between Caesar and Pompey erupted into open confrontation by early 49 BC. The consuls for the year Gaius Claudius Marcellus and Lucius Cornelius Lentulus Crus opposed Caesar.28 Pompey though remaining in Rome was then serving as the governor of Spain and commanded several legions. Throughout 50 BC an uneasy set of negotiations had been ongoing between Caesar and the senate with Caesar demanding the right to stand for the consulship while in command of his forces in absentia. Antony again brought up the proposal of the younger Curio that Caesar and Pompey lay down their commands and return to the status of private citizens.29 His proposal was well received by most of the senators but the consuls and Cato vehemently opposed it. Antony then made a new proposal Caesar would retain only two of his eight legions and the governorship of Illyrium if he was allowed to stand for the consulship in absentia. Though Pompey found the concession satisfactory Cato and Lentulus refused to back down. Antony fled Rome claiming to fear for his life and returned to Caesars camp in Cisalpine Gaul. Within days of Antonys withdrawal 7 January 49 BC the senate reconvened. Under the leadership of Cato and with the tacit support of Pompey the senate passed a senatus consultum ultimum a decree stripping Caesar of his command and ordering him to return to Rome and stand trial. The senate further declared Caesar a public enemy if he did not immediately disband his army.30 With all hopes of finding a peaceful solution gone Caesar used Antony as a pretext for marching on Rome. As tribune Antonys person was sacrosanct so it was unlawful to harm him or to refuse to recognize his veto. Three days later on 10 January Caesar crossed the Rubicon initiating the civil war.31 During the southern march Caesar placed Antony as his second in command.citation needed Caesars rapid advance surprised Pompey who withdrew from Italy to Greece. After entering Rome instead of pursuing Pompey Caesar marched to Spain to defeat the Pompeian loyalists there. Meanwhile Antony with the rank of propraetor was installed as governor of Italy and commander of the army stationed there while Marcus Aemilius Lepidus one of Caesars staff officers ran the provisional administration of Rome itself.3233 Though Antony was well liked by his soldiers most other citizens despised him for his lack of interest in the hardships they faced from the civil war.34 By the end of the year 49 BC Caesar already the ruler of Gaul had captured Italy Spain Sicily and Sardinia from his enemies. In early 48 BC he prepared to sail with seven legions to Greece to face Pompey. Caesar had entrusted the defense of Illyricum to Gaius Antonius Antonys younger brother and Publius Cornelius Dolabella. Pompeys forces however defeated them and assumed control of the Adriatic Sea along with it. Additionally the two legions they commanded defected to Pompey. Without their fleet Caesar lacked the necessary transport ships to cross into Greece with his seven legions. Instead he sailed with only two and placed Antony in command of the remaining five at Brundisium with instructions to join him as soon as he was able. In early 48 BC Lucius Scribonius Libo was given command of Pompeys fleet comprising some fifty galleys.3536 Moving off to Brundisium he blockaded Antony. Antony however managed to trick Libo into pursuing some decoy ships causing Libos squadron to be trapped and attacked. Most of Libos fleet managed to escape but several of his ships were trapped and captured.3537 With Libo gone Antony joined Caesar in Greece by March 48 BC. The Battle of Pharsalus the decisive battle of Caesars Civil War. Antony commanded the left wing of Caesars army. During the Greek campaign Plutarch records that Antony was Caesars top general and second only to him in reputation.38 Antony joined Caesar at the western Balkan peninsula and besieged Pompeys larger army at Dyrrhachium. With food sources running low Caesar in July ordered a nocturnal assault on Pompeys camp but Pompeys larger forces pushed back the assault. Though an indecisive result the victory was a tactical win for Pompey. Pompey however did not order a counterassault on Caesars camp allowing Caesar to retreat unhindered. Caesar would later remark the civil war would have ended that day if only Pompey had attacked him.39 Caesar managed to retreat to Thessaly with Pompey in pursuit. Assuming a defensive position at the plain of Pharsalus Caesars army prepared for pitched battle with Pompeys which outnumbered his own two to one. At the Battle of Pharsalus on 9 August 48 BC Caesar commanded the right wing opposite Pompey while Antony commanded the left.38 The resulting battle was a decisive victory for Caesar. Though the civil war did not end at Pharsalus the battle marked the pinnacle of Caesars power and effectively ended the Republic.40 The battle gave Caesar a much needed boost in legitimacy as prior to the battle much of the Roman world outside Italy supported Pompey and the senators around him as the legitimate Roman government. After Pompeys defeat most of the senate defected to Caesar including many of the soldiers who had fought under Pompey. Pompey himself fled to Ptolemaic Egypt but Pharaoh Ptolemy XIII Theos Philopator feared retribution from Caesar and had Pompey assassinated upon his arrival. Governor of Italyedit A cameo carving of Mark Antony depicted as Alexander the Great c. 40 BC After the battle Caesar was made dictator in absentia and appointed Antony as master of horse his lieutenant.41 Caesar without returning to Rome sailed for Egypt where he took part in the Alexandrian war deposing Ptolemy XIII in favour of Cleopatra who became Caesars mistress and bore him a son Caesarion. Caesars actions further strengthened Roman control over the already Romandominated kingdom.42 While Caesar was away in Egypt Antony remained in Rome to govern Italy and restore order.43 Without Caesar to guide him however Antony quickly faced political difficulties and proved himself unpopular. The chief cause of his political challenges concerned debt forgiveness. One of the tribunes for 47 BC Publius Cornelius Dolabella proposed a law which would have canceled all outstanding debts. Antony opposed the law for political and personal reasons he believed Caesar would not support such massive relief and suspected Dolabella had seduced his wife Antonia Hybrida. When Dolabella sought to enact the law by force and seized the Forum Antony responded by unleashing his soldiers upon the assembled masses killing hundreds.44 The resulting instability especially among Caesars veterans who would have benefited from the law forced Caesar to return to Italy by October 47 BC.43 Antonys handling of the affair with Dolabella led to a cooling of his relationship with Caesar. Antonys violent reaction had caused Rome to fall into a state of anarchy. Caesar sought to mend relations with Dolabella he was elected to a third term as consul for 46 BC but proposed the senate should transfer the consulship to Dolabella. When Antony protested Caesar was forced to withdraw the motion. Later Caesar sought to exercise his prerogatives as dictator and directly proclaim Dolabella as consul instead.45 Antony again protested and in his capacity as an augur declared the omens were unfavorable and Caesar again backed down.46 Seeing the expediency of removing Dolabella from Rome Caesar ultimately pardoned him for his role in the riots and took him as one of his generals in his campaign.38 Antony however was stripped of all official positions and received no appointments for the year 46 BC or 45 BC. Instead of Antony Caesar appointed Marcus Aemilius Lepidus to be his consular colleague for 46 BC Lepidus also replaced Antony as master of horse for Caesars various dictatorships.41 While Caesar campaigned in North Africa Antony remained in Rome as a mere private citizen. After returning victorious from North Africa Caesar was appointed dictator for ten years and brought Cleopatra and their son to Rome. Antony again remained in Rome while Caesar in 45 BC sailed to Spain to defeat the final opposition to his rule successful the civil war ended. Following the scandal with Dolabella Antony had divorced his second wife and quickly married Fulvia. Fulvia had previously been married to both Publius Clodius Pulcher and Gaius Scribonius Curio having been a widow since Curios death in the battle of the Bagradas in 49 BC. Though Antony and Fulvia were formally married in 47 BC Cicero suggests the two had been in a relationship since at least 58 BC.4748 The union produced two children Marcus Antonius Antyllus born 47 and Iullus Antonius born 45. Assassination of Caesaredit Main article Assassination of Julius Caesar Ides of Marchedit Whatever conflicts existed between himself and Caesar Antony remained faithful to Caesar ensuring their estrangement did not last long. Antony reunited with Caesar at Narbo in 45 BC with full reconciliation coming in 44 BC when Antony was elected consul alongside Caesar. Caesar planned a new invasion of Parthia and desired to leave Antony in Italy to govern Rome in his name. The reconciliation came soon after Antony is said to have rejected an offer from Gaius Trebonius one of Caesars generals to join a conspiracy to assassinate Caesar.4950 If such an offer was made Antony made no mention of the matter to Caesar. The Death of Julius Caesar as depicted by Vincenzo Camuccini. Caesar was assassinated on the Ides of March 15 March 44 BC. Soon after they assumed office together the Lupercalia was held on 15 February 44 BC. The festival was held in honor of Lupa the shewolf who suckled the infant orphans Romulus and Remus the founders of Rome.51 The political atmosphere of Rome at the time of the festival was deeply divided. Caesar had by this point centralised almost all political powers into his own hands. He was granted further honors including a form of semiofficial cult with Antony as his high priest.52 Additionally on 1 January 44 BC Caesar had been named dictator perpetuo removing any formal end to his autocratic powers. Caesars political rivals feared this dictatorship with no end date would transform the Republic into a monarchy abolishing the centuries of rule by the senate and people. During the festivals activities Antony publicly offered Caesar a diadem which Caesar threw off. When Antony placed the diadem in his lap Caesar ordered the diadem to be placed in the Temple of Jupiter Optimus Maximus.53 When Antony offered Caesar the crown there had been minor applause but mostly silence from the crowd. When Caesar refused it however the crowd was enthusiastic.54 The event presented a powerful message a diadem was a symbol of a king. By refusing it Caesar demonstrated he had no intention of making himself king. Antonys motive for such actions is not clear and it is unknown if he acted with Caesars prior approval or on his own.53 While commonly described as an event that was scripted who was central to planning it is unclear. One argument is that Antony moved forward with the gesture on his own accord possibly to embarrass or flatter Caesar. A later claim was that he was actually trying to convince Caesar not to go through with a kingship. By other accounts it was Caesars enemies who planned the incident as a way to frame him with it being claimed two enemies of Caesar approached him to argue he should take the diadem. Another theory one especially popular at the time was that Caesar himself had orchestrated the event to test public support on him becoming king.55 Marc Antonys Oration at Caesars Funeral as depicted by George Edward Robertson. A group of senators resolved to kill Caesar to prevent him from establishing a monarchy. Chief among them were Marcus Junius Brutus and Gaius Cassius Longinus. Although Cassius was the moving spirit in the plot winning over the chief assassins to the cause of tyrannicide Brutus with his familys history of deposing Romes kings became their leader.56 Cicero though not personally involved in the conspiracy later claimed Antonys actions sealed Caesars fate as such an obvious display of Caesars preeminence motivated them to act.57 Originally the conspirators had planned to eliminate not only Caesar but also many of his supporters including Antony but Brutus rejected the proposal limiting the conspiracy to Caesar alone.58 With Caesar preparing to depart for Parthia in late March the conspirators prepared to act when Caesar appeared for the senate meeting on the Ides of March 15 March. Antony also went with Caesar but was waylaid at the door of the Theatre of Pompey by Trebonius and was distracted from aiding Caesar. According to the Greek historian Plutarch as Caesar arrived at the senate Lucius Tillius Cimber presented him with a petition to recall his exiled brother.59 The other conspirators crowded round to offer their support. Within moments the group of five conspirators stabbed Caesar one by one. Caesar attempted to get away but being drenched by blood he tripped and fell. According to Roman historian Eutropius around 60 or more men participated in the assassination. Caesar was stabbed 23 times and died from the blood loss attributable to multiple stab wounds.6061 Leader of the Caesariansedit In the turmoil surrounding the assassination Antony escaped Rome dressed as a slave fearing Caesars death would be the start of a bloodbath among his supporters. When this did not occur he soon returned to Rome. The conspirators who styled themselves the liberatores liberators had barricaded themselves on the Capitoline hill. Although they believed Caesars death would restore the Republic Caesar had been immensely popular with the Roman middle and lower classes who became enraged upon learning a small group of aristocrats had killed their champion. Antony as the sole consul soon took the initiative and seized the state treasury. Calpurnia Caesars widow presented him with Caesars personal papers and custody of his extensive property clearly marking him as Caesars heir and leader of the Caesarians.62 Caesars master of horse Marcus Aemilius Lepidus marched over 6000 troops into Rome on 16 March to restore order and intimidate the liberatores. Lepidus wanted to storm the Capitol but Antony preferred a peaceful solution as a majority of both the liberatores and Caesars own supporters preferred a settlement over renewed civil war.63 On 17 March at Antonys arrangement the senate met to discuss a compromise which due to the presence of Caesars veterans in the city was quickly reached. Caesars assassins would be pardoned of their crimes and in return all of Caesars actions would be ratified.64 In particular the offices assigned to both Brutus and Cassius by Caesar were likewise ratified. Antony also agreed to accept the appointment of his rival Dolabella as his consular colleague to replace Caesar.65 This compromise was a great success for Antony who managed to simultaneously appease Caesars veterans reconcile the senate majority and appear to the liberatores as their partner.66 Octavian Julius Caesars adopted son. Antony would struggle with Octavian for leadership of the Caesarians after Caesars assassination. On 19 March Caesars will was opened and read. In it Caesar posthumously adopted his greatnephew Gaius Octavius and named him his principal heir. Then only nineteen years old and stationed with Caesars army in Macedonia the youth became a member of Caesars gens Julia with the name Gaius Julius Caesar for clarity it is historical convention to call him Octavian. Though not the chief beneficiary Antony did receive some bequests.67 Shortly after the compromise was reached as a sign of good faith Brutus against the advice of Cassius and Cicero agreed Caesar would be given a public funeral and his will would be validated. Caesars funeral was held on 20 March. Antony as Caesars faithful lieutenant and incumbent consul was chosen to preside over the ceremony and to recite a eulogy. In a demagogic speech he enumerated the deeds of Caesar and publicly reading his will detailed the donations Caesar had left to the Roman people. Antony then seized the bloodstained toga from Caesars body and presented it to the crowd. Worked into a fury by the bloody spectacle the assembly turned into a riot. Several buildings in the Forum and some houses of the conspirators were burned to the ground. Panicked many of the conspirators fled Italy.68 Under the pretext of not being able to guarantee their safety Antony relieved Brutus and Cassius of their judicial duties in Rome and instead assigned them responsibility for procuring wheat for Rome from Sicily and Asia. Such an assignment in addition to being unworthy of their rank would have kept them far from Rome and shifted the balance towards Antony. Refusing such secondary duties the two traveled to Greece instead. Additionally Cleopatra left Rome to return to Egypt. Despite the provisions of Caesars will Antony proceeded to act as leader of the Caesarians including appropriating for himself a portion of Caesars fortune rightfully belonging to Octavian. Antony enacted the lex Antonia which formally abolished the dictatorship in an attempt to consolidate his support among those who opposed Caesars dictatorial rule. He also enacted a number of laws he purported to have found in Caesars papers to ensure his popularity with Caesars veterans particularly by providing land grants to them. Lepidus with Antonys support was elected pontifex maximus succeeding Caesar. To solidify the alliance between Antony and Lepidus Antonys daughter Antonia Prima was engaged to Lepidus homonymous son. Surrounding himself with a bodyguard of over six thousand of Caesars veterans Antony presented himself as Caesars true successor largely ignoring Octavian.69 First conflict with Octavianedit Octavian arrived in Rome in May to claim his inheritance. Although Antony had amassed political support Octavian still had opportunity to rival him as the leading member of the Caesarian faction. The senate increasingly viewed Antony as a new tyrant Antony had also lost the support of many supporters of Caesar when he opposed the motion to elevate Caesar to divine status.70 When Antony refused to relinquish Caesars vast fortune to him Octavian borrowed heavily to fulfill the bequests in Caesars will to the Roman people and to his veterans as well as to establish his own bodyguard of veterans.71 This earned him the support of Caesarian sympathizers who hoped to use him as a means of eliminating Antony.72 The senate and Cicero in particular viewed Antony as the greater danger of the two. By summer 44 BC Antony was in a difficult political position he could either denounce the liberatores as murderers and alienate the senate or he could maintain his support for the compromise and risk betraying Caesars legacy strengthening Octavians position. In either case his situation as ruler of Rome would be weakened. Roman historian Cassius Dio later recorded that while Antony as consul maintained the advantage in the relationship the general affection of the Roman people was shifting to Octavian due to his status as Caesars son.7374 A denarius of Marcus Antonius struck in 42 BC Supporting the senatorial faction against Antony Octavian in September 44 BC encouraged the eminent senator Marcus Tullius Cicero to attack Antony in a series of speeches portraying him as a threat to the republic.7576 Risk of civil war between Antony and Octavian grew. Octavian continued to recruit Caesars veterans to his side away from Antony with two of Antonys legions defecting in November 44 BC. At that time Octavian only a private citizen lacked legal authority to command the Republics armies making his command illegal. With popular opinion in Rome turning against him and his consular term nearing its end Antony attempted to secure a favorable military assignment to secure an army to protect himself. The senate as was custom assigned Antony and Dolabella the provinces of Macedonia and Syria respectively to govern in 43 BC after their consular terms expired. Antony however objected to the assignment preferring to govern Cisalpine Gaul which was already controlled by Decimus Junius Brutus Albinus one of Caesars assassins.7778 When Decimus refused to surrender his province Antony marched north in December 44 BC with his remaining soldiers to take the province by force besieging Decimus at Mutina.79 The senate led by a fiery Cicero denounced Antonys actions and declared him an enemy of the state. Ratifying Octavians extraordinary command on 1 January 43 BC the senate dispatched him along with consuls Hirtius and Pansa to defeat Antony and his exhausted five legions.8081 Antonys forces were defeated at the Battle of Mutina in April 43 BC forcing Antony to retreat to Transalpine Gaul. Both consuls were killed however leaving Octavian in sole command of their armies some eight legions.8283 The Second Triumvirateedit Main article Second Triumvirate Forming the allianceedit Denarius struck at Ephesus in 41 B.C. commemorating the Second Triumvirate. On one side is Octavian later Caesar Augustus and on the other is Antony With Antony defeated the senate assigned command of the legions in northern Italy to Decimus. Sextus Pompey son of Caesars old rival Pompey Magnus was given command of the Republics fleet from his base in Sicily while Brutus and Cassius were granted the governorships of Macedonia and Syria respectively. These appointments attempted to renew the republican cause.84 However the eight legions serving under Octavian composed largely of Caesars veterans refused to follow one of Caesars murderers allowing Octavian to retain his command. Meanwhile Antony recovered his position by joining forces with Marcus Aemilius Lepidus who had been assigned the governorship of Transalpine Gaul and Nearer Spain.85 Antony sent Lepidus to Rome to broker a conciliation. Though he was an ardent Caesarian Lepidus had maintained friendly relations with the senate and with Sextus Pompey. His legions however quickly joined Antony giving him control over seventeen legions the largest army in the West.86 Map of the Roman Republic in 43 BC after the establishment of the Second Triumvirate Antony Lepidus Octavian Triumvirs collectively Sextus Pompey The Liberators Romes client kingdoms Ptolemaic Egypt By midMay Octavian began secret negotiations to form an alliance with Antony to unify the Caesarians against the liberatores. Remaining in Cisalpine Gaul Octavian dispatched emissaries to Rome in July 43 BC demanding he be appointed consul to succeed Hirtius and Pansa and that the senate rescind the decree declaring Antony a public enemy.87 When the senate refused Octavian marched on Rome with his eight legions and assumed control of the city in August 43 BC. Octavian had himself irregularly elected consul with a cousin rewarded his soldiers and then set about prosecuting Caesars murderers. Under the lex Pedia all of the conspirators and Sextus Pompey were convicted in absentia and declared public enemies. Then at the instigation of Lepidus Octavian went to Cisalpine Gaul to meet Antony. In November 43 BC Octavian Lepidus and Antony met near Bononia.88 After two days of discussions the group agreed to establish a three man dictatorship to govern the Republic for five years known to modern historians as the Second Triumvirate. They shared military command of the republics armies and provinces among themselves Antony received Gaul Lepidus Spain and Octavian as the junior partner Africa. They jointly governed Italy. The triumvirate would have to conquer the rest of Romes holdings Brutus and Cassius held the Eastern Mediterranean and Sextus Pompey held the Mediterranean islands.89 On 27 November 43 BC the triumvirate was formally established by a new law the lex Titia. Octavian and Antony reinforced their alliance through Octavians marriage to Antonys stepdaughter Claudia. The vengeance of Fulvia by Francisco Maura Y Montaner 1888 depicting Fulvia Antonys wife inspecting the severed head of Cicero The primary objective of the triumvirate was to avenge Caesars death and to make war upon his murderers. Before marching against Brutus and Cassius in the East the triumvirs issued proscriptions against their enemies in Rome. The dictator Lucius Cornelius Sulla had taken similar action to purge Rome of his opponents in 82 BC. The proscribed were named on public lists stripped of citizenship and outlawed. Their wealth and property were confiscated by the state and rewards were offered to anyone who secured their arrest or death. With such encouragements the proscription produced deadly results two thousand equites were executed and one third of the senate. Antony forced Octavian to give up Cicero a personal enemy of Antony and friend of Octavian who was then killed on 7 December. The confiscations helped replenish the state treasury which had been depleted by Caesars civil war the decade before when this seemed insufficient to fund the imminent war against Brutus and Cassius the triumvirs imposed new taxes especially on the wealthy. By January 42 BC the proscription had ended it had lasted two months and though less bloody than Sullas it traumatized Roman society. A number of those named and outlawed had fled to either Sextus Pompey in Sicily or to the liberatores in the East.90 Senators who swore loyalty to the triumvirate were allowed to keep their positions on 1 January 42 BC the senate officially deified Caesar as The Divine Julius and confirmed Antonys position as his high priest. War against the Liberatorsedit Main articles Liberators civil war and Battle of Philippi Due to the infighting within the triumvirate during 43 BC Brutus and Cassius had assumed control of much of Romes eastern territories and amassed a large army. Before the triumvirate could cross the Adriatic into Greece the triumvirate had to address the threat posed by Sextus Pompey and his fleet. From his base in Sicily Sextus raided the Italian coast and blockaded the triumvirs. Octavians friend and admiral Quintus Salvidienus Rufus thwarted an attack by Sextus against the southern Italian mainland at Rhegium but Salvidienus was then defeated in the resulting naval battle because of the inexperience of his crews. Only when Antony arrived with his fleet was the blockade broken. Though the blockade was defeated control of Sicily remained in Sextus hand but the defeat of the liberatores was the triumvirates first priority. First Battle of Philippi  3 October 42 BC Second Battle of Philippi  23 October 42 BC In the summer of 42 BC Octavian and Antony sailed for Macedonia to face the liberatores with nineteen legions the vast majority of their army91 approximately 100000 regular infantry plus supporting cavalry and irregular auxiliary units leaving Rome under the administration of Lepidus. Likewise the army of the liberatores also commanded an army of nineteen legions their legions however were not at full strength while the legions of Antony and Octavian were.91 While the triumvirs commanded a larger number of infantry the Liberators commanded a larger cavalry contingent.92 The liberatores who controlled Macedonia did not wish to engage in a decisive battle but rather to attain a good defensive position and then use their naval superiority to block the Triumvirs communications with their supply base in Italy. They had spent the previous months plundering Greek cities to swell their warchest and had gathered in Thrace with the Roman legions from the Eastern provinces and levies from Romes client kingdoms. Brutus and Cassius held a position on the high ground along both sides of the via Egnatia west of the city of Philippi. The south position was anchored to a supposedly impassable marsh while the north was bordered by impervious hills. They had plenty of time to fortify their position with a rampart and a ditch. Brutus put his camp on the north while Cassius occupied the south of the via Egnatia. Antony arrived shortly and positioned his army on the south of the via Egnatia while Octavian put his legions north of the road. Antony offered battle several times but the liberatores were not lured to leave their defensive stand. Thus Antony tried to secretly outflank the Brutus and Cassius position through the marshes in the south. This provoked a pitched battle on 3 October 42 BC. Antony commanded the triumvirates army due to Octavians sickness on the day with Antony directly controlling the right flank opposite Cassius. Because of his health Octavian remained in camp while his lieutenants assumed a position on the left flank opposite Brutus. In the resulting first battle of Philippi Antony defeated Cassius and captured his camp while Brutus overran Octavians troops and penetrated into the Triumvirs camp but was unable to capture the sick Octavian. The battle was a tactical draw but due to poor communications Cassius believed the battle was a complete defeat and committed suicide to prevent being captured. Brutus assumed sole command of the army and preferred a war of attrition over open conflict. His officers however were dissatisfied with these defensive tactics and his Caesarian veterans threatened to defect forcing Brutus to give battle at the second battle of Philippi on 23 October. While the battle was initially evenly matched Antonys leadership routed Brutus forces. Brutus committed suicide the day after the defeat and the remainder of his army swore allegiance to the Triumvirate. Over fifty thousand Romans died in the two battles. While Antony treated the losers mildly Octavian dealt cruelly with his prisoners and even beheaded Brutus corpse.939495 The battles of Philippi ended the civil war in favor of the triumvirs. With the defeat of Brutus and Cassius only Sextus Pompey and his fleet remained to challenge the triumvirates control of the Roman world. Master of the Roman Eastedit Division of the republicedit Map of the Roman Republic in 42 BC after the Battle of Philippi Antony Lepidus Octavian Triumvirs collectively Sextus Pompey Parthian Empire Romes client kingdoms Ptolemaic Egypt The victory at Philippi left the members of the triumvirate as masters of the republic save Sextus Pompey in Sicily. Upon returning to Rome the triumvirate repartitioned rule of Romes provinces among themselves with Antony as the clear senior partner. He received the largest distribution governing all of the Eastern provinces while retaining Gaul in the West. Octavians position improved as he received Spain which was taken from Lepidus. Lepidus was then reduced to holding only Africa and he assumed a clearly tertiary role in the triumvirate. Rule over Italy remained undivided but Octavian was assigned the difficult and unpopular task of demobilizing their veterans and providing them with land distributions in Italy.9697 Antony assumed direct control of the East while he installed one of his lieutenants as the ruler of Gaul. During his absence several of his supporters held key positions in Rome to protect his interests there. The East was in need of reorganization. In addition Rome contended with the Parthian Empire for dominance of the Near East. The Parthian threat to the triumvirates rule was urgent due to the fact that the Parthians supported the liberatores in the recent civil war aid which included the supply of troops at Philippi.98 As ruler of the East Antony also assumed responsibility for overseeing Caesars planned invasion of Parthia to avenge the defeat of Marcus Licinius Crassus at the Battle of Carrhae in 53 BC. In 42 BC the Roman East was composed of several directly controlled provinces and client kingdoms. The provinces included Macedonia Asia Bithynia Cilicia Cyprus Syria and Cyrenaica. Approximately half of the eastern territory was controlled by Romes client kingdoms nominally independent kingdoms subject to Roman direction. These kingdoms included Odrysian Thrace in Eastern Europe The Bosporan Kingdom along the northern coast of the Black Sea Galatia Pontus Cappadocia Armenia and several smaller kingdoms in Asia Minor Judea Commagene and the Nabataean kingdom in the Middle East Ptolemaic Egypt in Africa Activities in the Eastedit Further information Early life of Cleopatra VII and Reign of Cleopatra VII Left image Cleopatra VII bust in the Altes Museum Antikensammlung Berlin Roman artwork 
1 st century BC Right bust of Cleopatra VII dated 4030 BC Vatican Museums showing her with a melon hairstyle and Hellenistic royal diadem worn over her head Antony spent the winter of 42 BC in Athens where he ruled generously towards the Greek cities. A proclaimed philhellene Friend of all things Greek Antony supported Greek culture to win the loyalty of the inhabitants of the Greek East. He attended religious festivals and ceremonies including initiation into the Eleusinian Mysteries99 a secret cult dedicated to the worship of the goddesses Demeter and Persephone. Beginning in 41 BC he traveled across the Aegean Sea to Anatolia leaving his friend Lucius Marcius Censorius as governor of Macedonia and Achaea. Upon his arrival in Ephesus in Asia Antony was worshiped as the god Dionysus born anew.100 He demanded heavy taxes from the Hellenic cities in return for his proGreek culture policies but exempted those cities which had remained loyal to Caesar during the civil war and compensated those cities which had suffered under Caesars assassins including Rhodes Lycia and Tarsus. He granted pardons to all Roman nobles living in the East who had supported Pompey except for Caesars assassins. Antony and Cleopatra 1883 by Lawrence AlmaTadema depicting Antonys meeting with Cleopatra in 41 BC. Ruling from Ephesus Antony consolidated Romes hegemony in the East receiving envoys from Romes client kingdoms and intervening in their dynastic affairs extracting enormous financial gifts from them in the process. Though King Deiotarus of Galatia supported Brutus and Cassius following Caesars assassination Antony allowed him to retain his position. He also confirmed Ariarathes X as king of Cappadocia after the execution of his brother Ariobarzanes III of Cappadocia by Cassius before the Battle of Philippi. In Hasmonean Judea several Israelite delegations complained to Antony of the harsh rule of Phasael and Herod the sons of Romes assassinated chief minister in the territory of Judaea who was an Edomite called Antipater the Idumaean. After Herod offered him a large financial gift Antony confirmed the brothers in their positions. Subsequently influenced by the beauty and charms of Glaphyra the widow of Archelas formerly the high priest of Comana Antony deposed Ariarathes X and appointed Glaphyras son Archelas to rule Cappadocia.101 In October 41 Antony requested Romes chief eastern vassal the queen of Ptolemaic Egypt Cleopatra meet him at Tarsus in Cilicia. Antony had first met a young Cleopatra while campaigning in Egypt in 55 BC and again in 48 BC when Caesar had backed her as queen of Egypt over the claims of her halfsister Arsinoe. Cleopatra would bear Caesar a son Caesarion in 47 BC and the two were living in Rome as Caesars guests until his assassination in 44 BC. After Caesars assassination Cleopatra and Caesarion returned to Egypt where she named the child as her coruler. In 42 BC the Triumvirate in recognition for Cleopatras help towards Publius Cornelius Dolabella in opposition to the Liberators granted official recognition to Caesarions position as king of Egypt. Arriving in Tarsus aboard her magnificent ship Cleopatra invited Antony to a grand banquet to solidify their alliance.note 3 As the most powerful of Romes eastern vassals Egypt was indispensable in Romes planned military invasion of the Parthian Empire. At Cleopatras request Antony ordered the execution of Arsinoe who though marched in Caesars triumphal parade in 46 BC102 had been granted sanctuary at the temple of Artemis in Ephesus. Antony and Cleopatra then spent the winter of 41 BC together in Alexandria. Cleopatra bore Antony twin children Alexander Helios and Cleopatra Selene II in 40 BC and a third Ptolemy Philadelphus in 36 BC. Antony also granted formal control over Cyprus which had been under Egyptian control since 47 BC during the turmoil of Caesars civil war to Cleopatra in 40 BC as a gift for her loyalty to Rome.103 Antony in his first months in the East raised money reorganized his troops and secured the alliance of Romes client kingdoms. He also promoted himself as Hellenistic ruler which won him the affection of the Greek peoples of the East but also made him the target of Octavians propaganda in Rome. According to some ancient authors Antony led a carefree life of luxury in Alexandria.104105 Upon learning the Parthian Empire had invaded Romes territory in early 40 BC Antony left Egypt for Syria to confront the invasion. However after a short stay in Tyre he was forced to sail with his army to Italy to confront Octavian due to Octavians war against Antonys wife and brother. Fulvias civil waredit See also Perusine War Following the defeat of Brutus and Cassius while Antony was stationed in the East Octavian had authority over the West.note 4 Octavians chief responsibility was distributing land to tens of thousands of Caesars veterans who had fought for the Triumvirate. Additionally tens of thousands of veterans who had fought for the Republican cause in the war also required land grants. This was necessary to ensure they would not support a political opponent of the triumvirate.106 However the triumvirs did not possess sufficient statecontrolled land to allot to the veterans. This left Octavian with two options alienating many Roman citizens by confiscating their land or alienating many Roman soldiers who might back a military rebellion against the triumvirates rule. Octavian chose the former.107 As many as eighteen Roman towns through Italy were affected by the confiscations of 41 BC with entire populations driven out.108 Led by Fulvia the wife of Antony the senators grew hostile towards Octavian over the issue of the land confiscations. According to the ancient historian Cassius Dio Fulvia was the most powerful woman in Rome at the time.109 According to Dio while Publius Servilius Vatia and Lucius Antonius were the consuls for the year 41 BC real power was vested in Fulvia. As the motherinlaw of Octavian and the wife of Antony no action was taken by the senate without her support.110 Fearing Octavians land grants would cause the loyalty of the Caesarian veterans to shift away from Antony Fulvia traveled constantly with her children to the new veteran settlements in order to remind the veterans of their debt to Antony.111112 Fulvia also attempted to delay the land settlements until Antony returned to Rome so that he could share credit for the settlements. With the help of Antonys brother the consul of 41 BC Lucius Antonius Fulvia encouraged the senate to oppose Octavians land policies. Map of the Roman Republic in 39 BC after the Treaty of Brundisium and the Treaty of Misenum Antony Lepidus Octavian Triumvirs collectively Sextus Pompey Parthian Empire Romes client kingdoms Ptolemaic Egypt The conflict between Octavian and Fulvia caused great political and social unrest throughout Italy. Tensions escalated into open war however when Octavian divorced Claudia Fulvias daughter from her first husband Publius Clodius Pulcher. Outraged Fulvia supported by Lucius raised an army to fight for Antonys rights against Octavian. According to the ancient historian Appian Fulvias chief reason for the war was her jealousy of Antonys affairs with Cleopatra in Egypt and desire to draw Antony back to Rome.112 Lucius and Fulvia took a political and martial gamble in opposing Octavian and Lepidus however as the Roman army still depended on the triumvirs for their salaries.108 Lucius and Fulvia supported by their army marched on Rome and promised the people an end to the triumvirate in favor of Antonys sole rule. However when Octavian returned to the city with his army the pair were forced to retreat to Perusia in Etruria. Octavian placed the city under siege while Lucius waited for Antonys legions in Gaul to come to his aid.113110 Away in the East and embarrassed by Fulvias actions Antony gave no instructions to his legions.1
14 note 5 Without reinforcements Lucius and Fulvia were forced to surrender in February 40 BC. While Octavian pardoned Lucius for his role in the war and even granted him command in Spain as his chief lieutenant there Fulvia was forced to flee to Greece with her children. With the war over Octavian was left in sole control over Italy. When Antonys governor of Gaul died Octavian took over his legions there further strengthening his control over the West.115 Despite the Parthian Empires invasion of Romes eastern territories Fulvias civil war forced Antony to leave the East and return to Rome in order to secure his position. Meeting her in Athens Antony rebuked Fulvia for her actions before sailing on to Italy with his army to face Octavian laying siege to Brundisium. This new conflict proved untenable for both Octavian and Antony however. Their centurions who had become important figures politically refused to fight due to their shared service under Caesar. The legions under their command followed suit.116117 Meanwhile in Sicyon Fulvia died of a sudden and unknown illness.118 Fulvias death and the mutiny of their soldiers allowed the triumvirs to effect a reconciliation through a new powersharing agreement in September 40 BC. The Roman world was redivided with Antony receiving the Eastern provinces Octavian the Western provinces and Lepidus retained his junior position as governor of Africa. This agreement known as the Treaty of Brundisium reinforced the triumvirate and allowed Antony to begin preparing for Caesars longawaited campaign against the Parthian Empire. As a symbol of their renewed alliance Antony married Octavia Octavians sister in October 40 BC. Antonys Parthian Waredit Main article Antonys Parthian War RomanParthian relationsedit A map of the Parthian Empire and Kingdom of Armenia. Both states shared their western borders along the Euphrates River with Rome. The rise of the Parthian Empire in the 
3 rd century BC and Romes expansion into the Eastern Mediterranean during the 
2 nd century BC brought the two powers into direct contact causing centuries of tumultuous and strained relations. Though periods of peace developed cultural and commercial exchanges war was a constant threat. Influence over the buffer state of the Kingdom of Armenia located to the northeast of Roman Syria was often a central issue in the RomanParthian conflict. In 95 BC Tigranes the Great a Parthian ally became king. Tigranes would later aid Mithradates of Pontus against Rome before being decisively defeated by Pompey in 66 BC.119 Thereafter with his son Artavasdes in Rome as a hostage Tigranes would rule Armenia as an ally of Rome until his death in 55 BC. Rome then released Artavasdes who succeeded his father as king. In 53 BC Romes governor of Syria Marcus Licinius Crassus led an expedition across the Euphrates River into Parthian territory to confront the Parthian Shah Orodes II. Artavasdes II offered Crassus the aid of nearly forty thousand troops to assist his Parthian expedition on the condition that Crassus invade through Armenia as the safer route.120 Crassus refused choosing instead the more direct route by crossing the Euphrates directly into desert Parthian territory. Crassus actions proved disastrous as his army was defeated at the Battle of Carrhae by a numerically inferior Parthian force. Crassus defeat forced Armenia to shift its loyalty to Parthia with Artavasdes IIs sister marrying Orodes son and heir Pacorus.121 In early 44 BC Julius Caesar announced his intentions to invade Parthia and restore Roman power in the East. His reasons were to punish the Parthians for assisting Pompey in the recent civil war to avenge Crassus defeat at Carrhae and especially to match the glory of Alexander the Great for himself.122 Before Caesar could launch his campaign however he was assassinated. As part of the compromise between Antony and the Republicans to restore order following Caesars murder Publius Cornelius Dolabella was assigned the governorship of Syria and command over Caesars planned Parthian campaign. The compromise did not hold however and the republicans were forced to flee to the East. The republicans directed Quintus Labienus to attract the Parthians to their side in the resulting war against Antony and Octavian. After the liberatores were defeated at the Battle of Philippi Labienus joined the Parthians.123124 Despite Romes internal turmoil during the time the Parthians did not immediately benefit from the power vacuum in the East due to Orodes IIs reluctance despite Labienus urgings to the contrary.125 In the summer of 41 BC Antony to reassert Roman power in the East conquered Palmyra on the RomanParthian border.125 Antony then spent the winter of 41 BC in Alexandria with Cleopatra leaving only two legions to defend the Syrian border against Parthian incursions. The legions however were composed of former Republican troops and Labienus convinced Orodes II to invade. Parthian Invasionedit Main article PompeianParthian invasion of 40 BC Roman aureus bearing the portraits of Marcus Antonius left and Octavianus right issued in 41 BC to celebrate the establishment of the Second Triumvirate by Octavianus Antonius and Marcus Lepidus in 43 BC. A denarius of both Octavianus and Marcus Antonius struck in 41 BC A Parthian army led by Orodes IIs eldest son Pacorus invaded Syria in early 40 BC. Labienus the Republican ally of Brutus and Cassius accompanied him to advise him and to rally the former Republican soldiers stationed in Syria to the Parthian cause. Labienus recruited many of the former Republican soldiers to the Parthian campaign in opposition to Antony. The joint ParthianRoman force after initial success in Syria separated to lead their offensive in two directions Pacorus marched south toward Hasmonean Judea while Labienus crossed the Taurus Mountains to the north into Cilicia. Labienus conquered southern Anatolia with little resistance. The Roman governor of Asia Lucius Munatius Plancus a partisan of Antony was forced to flee his province allowing Labienus to recruit the Roman soldiers stationed there. For his part Pacorus advanced south to Phoenicia and Palestine. In Hasmonean Judea the exiled prince Antigonus allied himself with the Parthians. When his brother Romes client king Hyrcanus II refused to accept Parthian domination he was deposed in favor of Antigonus as Parthias client king in Judea. Pacorus conquest had captured much of the Syrian and Palestinian interior with much of the Phoenician coast occupied as well. The city of Tyre remained the last major Roman outpost in the region.126 Antony then in Egypt with Cleopatra did not respond immediately to the Parthian invasion. Though he left Alexandria for Tyre in early 40 BC when he learned of the civil war between his wife and Octavian he was forced to return to Italy with his army to secure his position in Rome rather than defeat the Parthians.126 Instead Antony dispatched Publius Ventidius Bassus to check the Parthian advance. Arriving in the East in spring 39 BC Ventidius surprised Labienus near the Taurus Mountains claiming victory at the Cilician Gates. Ventidius ordered Labienus executed as a traitor and the formerly rebellious Roman soldiers under his command were reincorporated under Antonys control. He then met a Parthian army at the border between Cilicia and Syria defeating it and killing a large portion of the Parthian soldiers at the Amanus Pass. Ventidius actions temporarily halted the Parthian advance and restored Roman authority in the East forcing Pacorus to abandon his conquests and return to Parthia.127 In the spring of 38 BC the Parthians resumed their offensive with Pacorus leading an army across the Euphrates. Ventidius in order to gain time leaked disinformation to Pacorus implying that he should cross the Euphrates River at their usual ford. Pacorus did not trust this information and decided to cross the river much farther downstream this was what Ventidius hoped would occur and gave him time to get his forces ready.128 The Parthians faced no opposition and proceeded to the town of Gindarus in Cyrrhestica where Ventidius army was waiting. At the Battle of Cyrrhestica Ventidius inflicted an overwhelming defeat against the Parthians which resulted in the death of Pacorus. Overall the Roman army had achieved a complete victory with Ventidius three successive victories forcing the Parthians back across the Euphrates.129 Pacorus death threw the Parthian Empire into chaos. Shah Orodes II overwhelmed by the grief of his sons death appointed his younger son Phraates IV as his successor. However Phraates IV assassinated Orodes II in late 38 BC succeeding him on the throne.130131 Ventidius feared Antonys wrath if he invaded Parthian territory thereby stealing his glory so instead he attacked and subdued the eastern kingdoms which had revolted against Roman control following the disastrous defeat of Crassus at Carrhae.132 One such rebel was King Antiochus of Commagene whom he besieged in Samosata. Antiochus tried to make peace with Ventidius but Ventidius told him to approach Antony directly. After peace was concluded Antony sent Ventidius back to Rome where he celebrated a triumph the first Roman to triumph over the Parthians.note 6 Conflict with Sextus Pompeyedit Antony and Octavia on the obverse of a tetradrachm issued at Ephesus in 39 BC. Antony and his brotherinlaw Octavian enacted a new treaty that year which redivided control over the Roman world. While Antony and the other triumvirs ratified the Treaty of Brundisium to redivide the Roman world among themselves the rebel Sextus Pompey the son of Caesars rival Pompey the Great was largely ignored. From his stronghold on Sicily he continued his piratical activities across Italy and blocked the shipment of grain to Rome. The lack of food in Rome undermined the triumvirates political support. This pressure forced the triumvirs to meet with Sextus in early 39 BC.133 While Octavian wanted an end to the ongoing blockade of Italy Antony sought peace in the West in order to make the Triumvirates legions available for his service in his planned campaign against the Parthians. Though the Triumvirs rejected Sextus initial request to replace Lepidus as the third man in the triumvirate they did grant other concessions. Under the terms of the Treaty of Misenum Sextus was allowed to retain control over Sicily and Sardinia with the provinces of Corsica and Greece being added to his territory. He was also promised a future position with the Priestly College of Augurs and the consulship for 35 BC. In exchange Sextus agreed to end his naval blockade of Italy supply Rome with grain and halt his piracy of Roman merchant ships.134 However the most important provision of the Treaty was the end of the proscription the trimumvirate had begun in late 43 BC. Many of the proscribed senators rather than face death fled to Sicily seeking Sextus protection. With the exception of those responsible for Caesars assassination all those proscribed were allowed to return to Rome and promised compensation. This caused Sextus to lose many valuable allies as the formerly exiled senators gradually aligned themselves with either Octavian or Antony. To secure the peace Octavian betrothed Marcus Claudius Marcellus Octavians threeyearold nephew and Antonys stepson to Sextus daughter Pompeia.135 With peace in the West secured Antony planned to retaliate against Parthia. Under an agreement with Octavian Antony would be supplied with extra troops for his campaign. With this military purpose on his mind Antony sailed to Greece with Octavia where he behaved in a most extravagant manner assuming the attributes of the Greek god Dionysus in 39 BC. A Roman bust of Mark Antony late 
1 st century AD Vatican Museums The peace with Sextus was shortlived however. When Sextus demanded control over Greece as the agreement provided Antony demanded the provinces tax revenues be to fund the Parthian campaign. Sextus refused.136 Meanwhile Sextus admiral Menas betrayed him shifting his loyalty to Octavian and thereby granting him control of Corsica Sardinia three of Sextus legions and a larger naval force. These actions worked to renew Sextus blockade of Italy preventing Octavian from sending the promised troops to Antony for the Parthian campaign. This new delay caused Antony to quarrel with Octavian forcing Octavia to mediate a truce between them. Under the Treaty of Tarentum Antony provided a large naval force for Octavians use against Sextus while Octavian promised to raise new legions for Antony to support his invasion of Parthia.137 As the term of the Triumvirate was set to expire at the end of 38 BC the two unilaterally extended their term of office another five years until 33 BC without seeking approval of the senate or the assemblies. To seal the Treaty Antonys elder son Marcus Antonius Antyllus then only six years old was betrothed to Octavians only daughter Julia then only an infant. With the Treaty signed Antony returned to the East leaving Octavia in Italy. Reconquest of Judeaedit With Publius Ventidius Bassus returned to Rome in triumph for his defensive campaign against the Parthians Antony appointed Gaius Sosius as the new governor of Syria and Cilicia in early 38 BC. Antony still in the West negotiating with Octavian ordered Sosius to depose Antigonus who had been installed in the recent Parthian invasion as the ruler of Hasmonean Judea and to make Herod the new Roman client king in the region. Years before in 40 BC the Roman senate had proclaimed Herod King of the Jews because Herod had been a loyal supporter of Hyrcanus II Romes previous client king before the Parthian invasion and was from a family with long standing connections to Rome.138 The Romans hoped to use Herod as a bulwark against the Parthians in the coming campaign.139 Advancing south Sosius captured the islandcity of Aradus on the coast of Phoenicia by the end of 38 BC. The following year the Romans besieged Jerusalem. After a fortyday siege the Roman soldiers stormed the city and despite Herods pleas for restraint acted without mercy pillaging and killing all in their path prompting Herod to complain to Antony.140 Herod finally resorted to bribing Sosius and his troops in order that they would not leave him king of a desert.141 Antigonus was forced to surrender to Sosius and was sent to Antony for the triumphal procession in Rome. Herod however fearing that Antigonus would win backing in Rome bribed Antony to execute Antigonus. Antony who recognized that Antigonus would remain a permanent threat to Herod ordered him beheaded in Antioch. Now secure on his throne Herod would rule the Herodian Kingdom until his death in 4 BC and would be an everfaithful client king of Rome. Parthian Campaignedit Main article Antonys Parthian War With the triumvirate renewed in 38 BC Antony returned to Athens in the winter with his new wife Octavia the sister of Octavian. With the assassination of the Parthian king Orodes II by his son Phraates IV who then seized the Parthian throne in late 38 BC Antony prepared to invade Parthia himself. A late Ptolemaic or Roman sculpted head of an Alexandrian nobleman perhaps a depiction of Mark Antony Brooklyn Museum Antony however realized Octavian had no intention of sending him the additional legions he had promised under the Treaty of Tarentum. To supplement his own armies Antony instead looked to Romes principal vassal in the East his lover Cleopatra. In addition to significant financial resources Cleopatras backing of his Parthian campaign allowed Antony to amass the largest army Rome had ever assembled in the East. Wintering in Antioch during 37 Antonys combined RomanEgyptian army numbered some 100000 including 60000 soldiers from sixteen legions 10000 cavalry from Spain and Gaul plus an additional 30000 auxiliaries.142 The size of his army indicated Antonys intention to conquer Parthia or at least receive its submission by capturing the Parthian capital of Ecbatana. Antonys rear was protected by Romes client kingdoms in Anatolia Syria and Judea while the client kingdoms of Cappadocia Pontus and Commagene would provide supplies along the march. Antonys first target for his invasion was the Kingdom of Armenia. Ruled by King Artavasdes II of Armenia Armenia had been an ally of Rome since the defeat of Tigranes the Great by Pompey the Great in 66 BC during the Third Mithridatic War. However following Marcus Licinius Crassuss defeat at the Battle of Carrhae in 53 BC Armenia was forced into an alliance with Parthia due to Romes weakened position in the East. Antony dispatched Publius Canidius Crassus to Armenia receiving Artavasdes IIs surrender without opposition. Canidius then led an invasion into the South Caucasus subduing Iberia. There Canidius forced the Iberian King Pharnavaz II into an alliance against Zober king of neighboring Albania subduing the kingdom and reducing it to a Roman protectorate. With Armenia and the Caucasus secured Antony marched south crossing into the Parthian province of Media Atropatene. Though Antony desired a pitched battle the Parthians would not engage allowing Antony to march deep into Parthian territory by midAugust of 36 BC. This forced Antony to leave his logistics train in the care of two legions approximately 10000 soldiers which was then attacked and completely destroyed by the Parthian army before Antony could rescue them. Though the Armenian King Artavasdes II and his cavalry were present during the massacre they did not intervene. Despite the ambush Antony continued the campaign. However Antony was soon forced to retreat in midOctober after a failed twomonth siege of the provincial capital. The retreat soon proved a disaster as Antonys demoralized army faced increasing supply difficulties in the mountainous terrain during winter while constantly being harassed by the Parthian army. According to Plutarch eighteen battles were fought between the retreating Romans and the Parthians during the monthlong march back to Armenia with approximately 20000 infantry and 4000 cavalry dying during the retreat alone. Once in Armenia Antony quickly marched back to Syria to protect his interests there by late 36 BC losing an additional 8000 soldiers along the way. In all twofifths of his original army some 80000 men had died during his failed campaign.143 The narration of Strabo and Plutarch blames the Armenian king for the defeat but modern sources note Antonys poor management.144 Antony and Cleopatraedit Further information Early life of Cleopatra VII and Reign of Cleopatra VII Meanwhile in Rome the triumvirate was no more. Octavian forced Lepidus to resign after the older triumvir attempted to take control of Sicily after the defeat of Sextus. Now in sole power Octavian was occupied in wooing the aristocracy to his side. He married Livia and started to attack Antony. He argued that Antony was a man of low morals to have left his faithful wife abandoned in Rome with the children to be with the promiscuous queen of Egypt. Antony was accused of everything but most of all of going nativecitation needed an unforgivable crime to the proud Romans. Several times Antony was summoned to Rome but remained in Alexandria with Cleopatra.145 A map of the Donations of Alexandria by Mark Antony to Cleopatra and her children in 34 BC. Unallotted Roman territory Donations to Cleopatras Children Cleopatras Original Kingdom Again with Egyptian money Antony invaded Armenia this time successfully. In the return a mock Roman triumph was celebrated in the streets of Alexandria. The parade through the city was a pastiche of Romes most important military celebration. For the finale the whole city was summoned to hear a very important political statement. Surrounded by Cleopatra and her children Antony ended his alliance with Octavian. He distributed kingdoms among his children Alexander Helios was named king of Armenia Media and Parthia territories which were not for the most part under the control of Rome his twin Cleopatra Selene got Cyrenaica and Libya and the young Ptolemy Philadelphus was awarded Syria and Cilicia. As for Cleopatra she was proclaimed Queen of Kings and Queen of Egypt to rule with Caesarion Ptolemy XV Caesar son of Cleopatra by Julius Caesar King of Kings and King of Egypt. Most important of all Caesarion was declared legitimate son and heir of Caesar. These proclamations were known as the Donations of Alexandria and caused a fatal breach in Antonys relations with Rome. While the distribution of nations among Cleopatras children was hardly a conciliatory gesture it did not pose an immediate threat to Octavians political position. Far more dangerous was the acknowledgment of Caesarion as legitimate and heir to Caesars name. Octavians base of power was his link with Caesar through adoption which granted him muchneeded popularity and loyalty of the legions. To see this convenient situation attacked by a child borne by the richest woman in the world was something Octavian could not accept. The triumvirate expired on the last day of 33 BC and was not renewed. Another civil war was beginning. During 33 and 32 BC a propaganda war was fought in the political arena of Rome with accusations flying between sides. Antony in Egypt divorced Octavia and accused Octavian of being a social upstart of usurping power and of forging the adoption papers by Caesar. Octavian responded with treason charges of illegally keeping provinces that should be given to other men by lots as was Romes tradition and of starting wars against foreign nations Armenia and Parthia without the consent of the senate. Antony was also held responsible for Sextus Pompeys execution without a trial. In 32 BC the senate deprived him of his powers and declared war against Cleopatra  not Antony because Octavian had no wish to advertise his role in perpetuating Romes internecine bloodshed. Octavian and other Roman Senators believed that turning the hostilities towards Cleopatra as the villain would gather the most support from Romans for war. Contributing to this would be the years of propaganda against Cleopatra published by the Romans dating back to the days of Julius Caesar. Octavian informed of Antonys will by two Antonian defectors sacrilegiously raided the Temple of Vesta to secure it. The will which some modern scholars have suggested was partially forged  largely on legal grounds  is never so described in the ancient sources. Octavians publication of the wills provisions which named Antony and Cleopatras children as heirs and directed his burial in Alexandria was used as a political weapon in Rome to declare war against Cleopatra and Egypt as a whole.146 This was the perfect summation of their attacks on the woman Antony loved and they believed threatened their republic. Both consuls Gnaeus Domitius Ahenobarbus and Gaius Sosius both Antonys men and a third of the senate abandoned Rome to meet Antony and Cleopatra in Greece. The Battle of Actium 1672 by Laureys a Castro National Maritime Museum London In 31 BC the war started. Octavians general Marcus Vipsanius Agrippa captured the Greek city and naval port of Methone loyal to Antony. The enormous popularity of Octavian with the legions secured the defection of the provinces of Cyrenaica and Greece to his side. On 2 September the naval Battle of Actium took place. Antony and Cleopatras navy was overwhelmed and they were forced to escape to Egypt with 60 ships. Deathedit Main article Death of Cleopatra Further information Epaphroditus freedman of Augustus and Tomb of Antony and Cleopatra This mid
1 stcenturyBC Roman wall painting in Pompeii Italy showing Venus holding a cupid is most likely a depiction of Cleopatra VII of Ptolemaic Egypt as Venus Genetrix with her son Caesarion as the cupid similar in appearance to the now lost statue of Cleopatra erected by Julius Caesar in the Temple of Venus Genetrix within the Forum of Caesar. The owner of the House of Marcus Fabius Rufus at Pompeii walled off the room with this painting most likely in immediate reaction to the execution of Caesarion on orders of Augustus in 30 BC when artistic depictions of Caesarion would have been considered a sensitive issue for the ruling regime.147148 Octavian now close to absolute power invaded Egypt with Agrippa in August of 30 BC. With no other refuge to escape to Antony stabbed himself with his sword in the mistaken belief that Cleopatra had already done so. When he found out that Cleopatra was still alive his friends brought him to Cleopatras monument in which she was hiding and he died in her arms. Cleopatra was allowed to conduct Antonys burial rites after she had been captured by Octavian. Realising that she was destined for Octavians triumph in Rome she made several attempts to take her life and finally succeeded in midAugust. Octavian had Caesarion and Antyllus killed but he spared Iullus as well as Antonys children by Cleopatra who were paraded through the streets of Rome. Aftermath and legacyedit Ciceros son Cicero Minor announced Antonys death to the senate.149 Antonys honours were revoked and his statues removed150 but he was not subject to a complete damnatio memoriae.151 Ciceros son also made a decree that no member of the Antonii would ever bear the name Marcus again.152 In this way Heaven entrusted the family of Cicero the final acts in the punishment of Antony.153 When Antony died Octavian became uncontested ruler of Rome. In the following years Octavian who was known as Augustus after 27 BC managed to accumulate in his person all administrative political and military offices. When Augustus died in AD 14 his political powers passed to his adopted son Tiberius the Roman Empire had begun. The rise of Caesar and the subsequent civil war between his two most powerful adherents effectively ended the credibility of the Roman oligarchy as a governing power and ensured that all future power struggles would centre upon which one individual would achieve supreme control of the government eliminating the senate and the former magisterial structure as important foci of power in these conflicts. Thus in history Antony appears as one of Caesars main adherents he and Octavian being the two men around whom power coalesced following the assassination of Caesar and finally as one of the three men chiefly responsible for the demise of the republic.154 Marriages and issueedit Fragmentary portrait bust from Smyrna thought to depict Octavia sister of Octavian and Antonys wife A tetradrachm of Marcus Antonius and Cleopatra VII of Ptolemaic Egypt Antony was known to have an obsession with women and sex.155156 He had many mistresses including Cytheris and was married in succession to Fadia Antonia Fulvia Octavia and Cleopatra. He left a number of children.157158 Through his daughters by Octavia he would be ancestor to the Roman emperors Caligula Claudius and Nero. Marriage to Fadia a daughter of a freedman. According to Cicero Fadia bore Antony several children. Nothing is known about Fadia or their children. Cicero is the only Roman source that mentions Antonys first wife. Marriage to first paternal cousin Antonia Hybrida Minor daughter of Gaius Antonius Hybrida. According to Plutarch Antony threw her out of his house in Rome because she slept with his friend the tribune Publius Cornelius Dolabella. This occurred by 47 BC and Antony divorced her. By Antonia he had a daughter Antonia married the wealthy Greek Pythodoros of Tralles. Marriage to Fulvia by whom he had two sons Marcus Antonius Antyllus murdered by Octavian in 30 BC. Iullus Antonius married Claudia Marcella the Elder daughter of Octavia. Marriage to Octavia the Younger sister of Octavian later emperor Augustus they had two daughters Antonia the Elder married Lucius Domitius Ahenobarbus consul 16 BC maternal grandmother of the Empress Valeria Messalina and paternal grandmother of the emperor Nero. Antonia the Younger married Nero Claudius Drusus the younger son of the Empress Livia Drusilla and brother of the emperor Tiberius mother of the emperor Claudius paternal grandmother of the emperor Caligula and empress Agrippina the Younger and maternal greatgrandmother of the emperor Nero. Children with the Queen Cleopatra VII of Egypt the former lover of Julius Caesar Alexander Helios Cleopatra Selene II married King Juba II of Numidia and later Mauretania the queen of Syria Zenobia of Palmyra was reportedly descended from Selene and Juba II. Ptolemy Philadelphus. Descendantsedit Through his daughters by Octavia he was the paternal great grandfather of Roman emperor Caligula the maternal grandfather of emperor Claudius and both maternal greatgreatgrandfather and paternal greatgreat uncle of the emperor Nero of the JulioClaudian dynasty. Through his eldest daughter he was ancestor to the long line of kings and corulers of the Bosporan Kingdom the longestliving Roman client kingdom as well as the rulers and royalty of several other Roman client states. Through his daughter by Cleopatra Antony was ancestor to the royal family of Mauretania another Roman client kingdom while through his sole surviving son Iullus he was ancestor to several famous Roman statesmen. 1. Antonia born 50 BC had 1 child A. Pythodorida of Pontus 30 BC or 29 BC  38 AD had 3 children I. Artaxias III King of Armenia 13 BC  35 AD died without issue II. Polemon II King of Pontus 12 BC or 11 BC  74 AD died without issue III. Antonia Tryphaena Queen of Thrace 10 BC  55 AD had 4 children a. Rhoemetalces II King of Thrace died 38 AD died without issue b. Gepaepyris Queen of the Bosporan Kingdom had 2 children i. Tiberius Julius Mithridates King of the Bosporan Kingdom died 68 AD died without issue ii. Tiberius Julius Cotys I King of the Bosporan Kingdom had 1 child i. Tiberius Julius Rhescuporis I King of the Bosporan Kingdom died 90 AD had 1 child i. Tiberius Julius Sauromates I King of the Bosporan Kingdom had 1 child i. Tiberius Julius Cotys II King of the Bosporan Kingdom had 1 child 2. Marcus Antonius Antyllus 4730 BC died without issue 3. Iullus Antonius 432 BC had 3 children A. Antonius died young no issue B. Lucius Antonius 20 BC  25 AD issue unknown C. Iulla Antonia  born after 19 BC issue unknown 4. Prince Alexander Helios of Egypt born 40 BC died without issue presumably159 5. Cleopatra Selene Queen of Mauretania 40 BC  6 AD had 2 children A. Ptolemy King of Mauretania 1 BC  40 AD had 1 child I. Drusilla 3879 AD had 1 child a. Gaius Julius Alexion King of Emesa had 1 child B. A daughter born around 9 BC 6. Antonia Major 39 BC  before 25 AD had 3 children A. Domitia Lepida the Elder c.19 BC  59 AD had 1 child I. Quintus Haterius Antoninus B. Gnaeus Domitius Ahenobarbus 17 BC  40 AD had 1 child I. Nero Lucius Domitius Ahenobarbus see line of Antonia Minor below C. Domitia Lepida the Younger 10 BC  54 AD had 3 children I. Marcus Valerius Messala Corvinus II. Valeria Messalina 17 or 2048 AD had 2 children a. Messalina was the mother of the two youngest children of the Roman emperor Claudius listed below III. Faustus Cornelius Sulla Felix 2262 AD had 1 child a. a son this child and the only child of the Claudia Antonia listed below are the same person 7. Antonia Minor 36 BC  37 AD had 3 children A. Germanicus Julius Caesar 15 BC  19 AD had 6 children I. Nero Julius Caesar Germanicus 630 AD died without issue II. Drusus Julius Caesar Germanicus 833 AD died without issue III. Gaius Julius Caesar Augustus Germanicus Caligula 1241 AD had 1 child a. Julia Drusilla 3941 AD died young IV. Julia Agrippina Agrippina the Younger 1559 AD had 1 child a. Nero Claudius Caesar Augustus Germanicus 3768 AD had 1 child i. Claudia Augusta January 63 AD  April 63 AD died young V. Julia Drusilla 1638 AD died without issue VI. Julia Livilla 1842 AD died without issue B. Claudia Livia Julia Livilla 13 BC  31 AD had three children I. Julia Livia 743 AD had 4 children a. Rubellius Plautus 3362 AD had several children160 b. Gaius Rubellius Blandus c. Rubellius Drusus II. Tiberius Julius Caesar Nero Gemellus 1937 or 38 AD died without issue III. Tiberius Claudius Caesar Germanicus II Gemellus 1923 AD died young C. Tiberius Claudius Caesar Augustus Germanicus 10 BC  54 AD had 4 children I. Tiberius Claudius Drusus died young II. Claudia Antonia c.3066 AD had 1 child a. a son died young III. Claudia Octavia 39 or 4062 AD died without issue IV. Tiberius Claudius Caesar Britannicus 4155 AD died without issue 8. Prince Ptolemy Philadelphus of Egypt 3629 BC died without issue presumably159 Artistic portrayalsedit Antony George Coulouris addresses the crowd in the Mercury Theatre production of Caesar 1937 Orson Welless moderndress adaptation of Shakespeares tragedy Works in which the character of Mark Antony plays a central role William Shakespeares Julius Caesar Julius Caesar 1950 film based on this played by Charlton Heston Julius Caesar 1953 film based on this played by Marlon Brando Julius Caesar 1970 film based on this played by Charlton Heston again Antony and Cleopatra several works with that title John Drydens 1677 play All for Love Jules Massenets 1914 opera Cloptre The 1934 film Cleopatra played by Henry Wilcoxon Orson Welles innovative 1937 adaptation of William Shakespeare at Mercury Theatre has George Coulouris as Marcus Antonius.161 The 1953 film Serpent of the Nile played by Raymond Burr The 1963 film Cleopatra played by Richard Burton The 1964 film Carry On Cleo played by Sid James The 1983 miniseries The Cleopatras played by Christopher Neame The TV series Xena Warrior Princess played by Manu Bennett In the Age of Empires The Rise of Rome Mark Antony featured as a short swordsman. The 1999 film Cleopatra played by Billy Zane The Capcom video game Shadow of Rome in which he is depicted as the main antagonist The 2003 TV movie Imperium Augustus played by Massimo Ghini The 2005 TV mini series Empire played by Vincent Regan The 20052007 HBOBBC TV series Rome played by James Purefoy The 20092013 TV series Horrible Histories played by Mathew Baynton and the 2015 reboot series of the same name portrayed by Tom Stourton in 2019 The 2006 BBC One docudrama Ancient Rome The Rise and Fall of an Empire played by Alex Ferns As Cleopatras guardian and level boss of Lust in the Xbox 360 game Dantes Inferno released by Visceral Games in 2010. The Choices Stories You Play visual novel A Courtesan of Rome in which he is depicted as one of the love interests. The 2021 TV series Domina played by Liam Garrigan 2023 Netflix TV series African Queens portrayed by Craig Russell. Novelsedit In Colleen McCulloughs Masters of Rome series 19902007 Antony is portrayed as a deeply flawed character a brave warrior but sexually promiscuous often drunk and foolish and a monster of vanity who loves riding in a chariot drawn by lions. Margaret Georges The Memoirs of Cleopatra 1997 Conn Igguldens Emperor novels 200313 Robert Harriss Dictator 2015 Michael Livingstons The Shards of Heaven 2015162163 Poetryedit Geoffrey Chaucers fourteenthcentury poem The Legend of Good Women. Lytle William Haines 18261863 Antony and Cleopatra. Constantine P. Cavafys poem The God Abandons Antony 1911 a hymn to human dignity depicts the imaginary last moments of Mark Antony while he sees his fortunes turning around. See alsoedit Flamen Divi Julii priest of the cult of Caesar of which Mark Antony was the first to serve. Antonia gens the ancestral gens of Mark Antony. Notesedit  As recorded by a calendar inscription known as the Fasti Verulani c. 1737 AD for 14 January  Degrassi Inscriptiones Italiae 

13.2.3 97398 as cited by Jerzy Linderski and Anna KaminskaLinderski The Quaestorship of Marcus Antonius Phoenix 
28.2  1974 p. 217 note 24. The religious prohibition placed by Augustus on the day marked as a dies vitiosus defective day is explained by Linderski The Augural Law Aufstieg und Niedergang der rmischen Welt II.16 1986 pp. 21872188. 14 January is accepted as Antonys birthday also by C.B.R. Pelling Plutarch Life of Antony Cambridge University Press 1988 p. 299 commentary to Plutarch Antony 
73.5  Nikos Kokkino Antonia Augusta Routledge 1992 p. 11 Pat Southern Mark Antony Tempus 1998 p. ii Adrian Goldsworthy Antony and Cleopatra Yale University Press 2010 n.p.. According to Suetonius Claudius 
11.3  the emperor Claudius Antonys grandson through maternal lineage evaded the prohibition on commemorating Antonys birthday by calculations showing that had he been born under the Julian calendar he would have shared his birthday with Drusus the emperors father. Drusus was born in late March or early April based on a reference that he was born within the third month after his mother Livia married Augustus on 17 January G. Radke Der Geburtstag des lteren Drusus Wurzburger Jahrbucher fur die Altertumswissenschaft 4 1978 pp. 211213 proposed that a birth date of 28 March for Drusus would resolve the chronological difficulties. Radkes proposal is summarized in English by the commentary on Suetonius sentence by Donna W. Hurley Suetonius Divus Claudius Cambridge University Press 2001 p. 106 and by Marleen B. Flory The Symbolism of Laurel in Cameo Portraits of Livia in Memoirs of the American Academy in Rome University of Michigan Press 1995 vol. 40 p. 56 note 48.  Cicero is the only ancient source to mention a first marriage to an otherwise unknown Fadia Philippics XIII 10  Ancient writers e.g. Appian Civil Wars 

5.8.1  place the beginning of their famous romance at this meeting with Antony totally surrendering to Cleopatras beauty but modern historians reject this notion as retrospective historical propaganda on the part of Augustus.  Lepidus though still a member of the Triumvirate was relegated to a junior position within the threeman dictatorship as Antony and Octavian established themselves.  It is also speculated that Antonys legions composed largely of Caesarian veterans did not wish to fight the adoptive son of their former general.  After celebrating his triumph Ventidius disappears from the historical record. Referencesedit Citationsedit  Also spelled as Marc Antony  Mark Antony. HISTORY. 24 October 2019.  Plutarch Life of Antony 
86.5 .  Suerbaum 1980 327334.  a b Huzar 1978 p. 14  Goldsworthy 2010 p. 39  a b Huzar 1978 p. 15  a b Scullard 1980 p. 154  Huzar 1978 p. 17  Eyben 1993 p. 236  In ancient Rome political discourse was sometimes like an internet fight. ZME Science. 24 August 2018. Retrieved 10 December 2019.  History Mindy Weisberger 201809
02 T1212
50 Z 2 September 2018. Think Politics Today Is Ugly Politicians in Ancient Rome Were Insulting Too. livescience.com. Retrieved 10 December 2019.cite web CS1 maint numeric names authors list link  Eyben 1993 p. 58  Huzar 1978 p. 25  Weigall 1931 p. 102  JalletHuant 2009 p. 25  Rocca  a b Plutarch Antony 3  SianiDavis 1997 p. 316  Bradford 2000 p. 43  SianiDavis 1997 388  Roller 2010 pp. 2425.  JalletHuant 2009 pp. 2731  Martin 2003 pp. 174177  JalletHuant 2009 p. 33  Holland Rubicon p. 287  Ramsey John T 2016. How and why was Pompey Made sole consul in 52 BC. Historia Zeitschrift fr Alte Geschichte. 65 3 298324. doi
10.2 51
62 historia20160017. ISSN 00182311. JSTOR 45019234.  Caesar B.G. 
8.5 0  Plutarch Antony 6  Caesar B.C. i.5  Plutarch Pompey 
56.4   Hinard 2000 p. 786  JalletHuant 2009 pp. 3940  Plutarch Antony 8  a b Broughton p. 281  Holmes p. 127  Holmes p. 128  a b c Plutarch Antony 10  Plutarch Pompey 65  Davis 1999 p. 59  a b Wilson 2021 p. 309.  JalletHuant 2009 pp. 5253  a b Hinard 2000 pp. 796 798  Plutarch Antony c. 9 in Plutarch Roman Lives ISBN 9780192825025  Dio 
43.5 
1.8 .  Plutarch Antony 
11.3  less clear from Dio.  M. Tullius Cicero Orations The fourteen orations against Marcus Antonius Philippics THE SECOND SPEECH OF M. T. CICERO AGAINST MARCUS ANTONIUS. CALLED ALSO THE SECOND PHILIPPIC. section 48. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  M. Tullius Cicero Orations The fourteen orations against Marcus Antonius Philippics THE SECOND SPEECH OF M. T. CICERO AGAINST MARCUS ANTONIUS. CALLED ALSO THE SECOND PHILIPPIC. section 99. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  Broughton p. 299  Bringmann p. 272  A.S. Kline  Author and Translator. tonykline.co.uk.  Fuller Chapter 13  a b Plutarch Antony 12  Strauss Barry 2016. The Death of Caesar The Story of Historys Most Famous Assassination. Simon and Schuster. p. 62. ISBN 9781451668810.  Strauss Barry 2016. The Death of Caesar The Story of Historys Most Famous Assassination. Simon and Schuster. pp. 6163. ISBN 9781451668810.  Broughton p. 320  Cicero 
2 nd Philippic 34  Velleius Paterculus 
2.5 
8.5  Plutarch Brutus 
18.2 6.  The Internet Classics Archive  Marcus Brutus by Plutarch. classics.mit.edu.  Woolfpage needed  Suetonius Julius c. 82.  David 2000 p. 246  JalletHuant 2009 p. 64  Plutarch Antony 14  Bramstedt 2004 p. 143  Hinard 2000 827  Hinard 2000 p. 832  Eck 2003 p. 10  Hinard 2000 p. 248  Eck 2003 p. 11.  Boatwright Mary 2012. The Romans From Village to Empire. New York Oxford University Press. pp. 272273. ISBN 9780199730575.  Syme 1939 pp. 114120.  Dio Cassius Roman History XLV 11  Bleicken 1998 p. 58  Chisholm 1981 p. 26.  Rowell 1962 p. 30  Eck 2003 pp. 1112.  Rowell 1962 p. 21  Rowell 1962 p. 24  Eck 2003 p. 12  Syme 1939 p. 167  Syme 1939 pp. 173174  Scullard 1982 p. 157.  Hinard 2000 p. 838  Syme 1939 pp. 176186.  Hinard 2000 pp. 839840  Rowell 1962 pp. 2627  Eck 2003 p. 15  Hinard 2000 pp. 841842  Hinard 2000 pp. 846847  a b Appian The Civil Wars Book 14 CVIII  Hinard 2000 p. 850  JalletHuant 2009 pp. 144153  Hindard 2000 pp. 850851  Cosme 2009 pp. 5657  Hinard 2000 p. 854  Hinard 2000 p. 253  Bivar 1968 pp. 5657  Hinard 2000 p. 854  Lepelley 1998 p. 435  Cassius Dio Roman History 
49.3 2 Appian Civil Wars 
5.7  Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology vol. I p. 263 Archelaus Nos. 3 4 vol. II p. 272 Glaphyra.  Dio 
43.1 
9.2 3 Appian 
2.1 
01.4 20  Mitford pp. 12891297.  Plutarch Antony 2830  Cassius Dio Roman History l. 48.  Eck p. 18  Eck pp. 1819.  a b Eck p. 19  M. Tullius Cicero Orations The fourteen orations against Marcus Antonius Philippics THE SECOND SPEECH OF M. T. CICERO AGAINST MARCUS ANTONIUS. CALLED ALSO THE SECOND PHILIPPIC. section 48. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  a b Cassius Dio  Book 48. penelope.uchicago.edu.  Appian The Civil Wars BOOK V CHAPTER II section 14. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  a b Appian The Civil Wars BOOK V CHAPTER III section 19. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  Appian The Civil Wars BOOK V CHAPTER IV section 32. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  David 2000 p. 254  Southern 2001 p. 78  Eck 2003 p. 21.  Eder 2005 p. 19  Plutarch Antony chapter 30 section 3. www.perseus.tufts.edu.  Scullard 1984 p. 106  Plutarch. Life of Crassus. 
19.1 3.  Plutarch Crassus 19 22 33.  Hinard 2000 p. 820  Morello Antonio 2005. Titus Labienus et Cingulum Quintus Labienus Parthicus Volume 9 of Nummus et historia. Circolo numismatico Mario Rasile.  Coins of Rome about Parthia Quintus Labienus 4239 B.C.. Retrieved 5 February 2013.  a b Hinard 2000 p. 857  a b Hinard 2000 p. 858  Hinard 2000 p. 877  Smith Dictionary of Greek and Roman Biography and Mythology pp. 1239  DandoCollins 2008 pp. 3639  Cassius Dio Roman History Book 49 23  Hinard 2000 pp. 879 883  Plutarch Antony Chapter 34  Appian The Civil Wars Book 5 69  Ward Allen M. et al. A History of the Roman People. Englewood Cliffs Prentice Hall 2003.  Appian The Civil Wars Book 5 73  Appian The Civil Wars Book 5 77  Appian The Civil Wars Book 5 95  Armstrong p. 126  Josephus The Wars of the Jews 
1.1 
4.4   Rocca 2008 pp. 4547  Josephus The Jewish Wars 1355  Huzar Eleanor Goltz 1978. Mark Antony a biography. University of Minnesota Press. p. 176. ISBN 9780816608638.  Plutarch. Antony. p. 
50.1 .  Chaumont M. L. 5 August 2011. ANTONY MARK. Encyclopaedia Iranica.  Boatwright Mary 2012. The Romans From Village to Empire. New York Oxford University Press. pp. 269271. ISBN 9780199735075.  Supporting authenticity Johnson John Robert 1978. The authenticity and validity of Antonys will. LAntiquit Classique. 47 2 494503. doi
10.3 4
06 antiq.19
78.1 908. ISSN 07702817. JSTOR 41651325. Against authenticity Sirianni Frank A 1984. Was Antonys will partially forged. LAntiquit Classique. 53 236241. doi
10.3 4
06 antiq.19
84.2 126. ISSN 07702817. JSTOR 41657427. Dio. 
50.2 
0.7 .  Roller 2010 175.  Walker 2008 35 4244.  Dio 
51.1 
9.4 .  Plut. Ant. 
49.4  Dio 
51.1 
9.3 .  Akert Nick. Antony Augustus and Damnatio Memoriae. University of Pennsylvania. Discentes. Retrieved 6 May 2017.  Plut. Ant. 
49.4  Dio 
51.1 
9.4 .  Plut. Ant. 
49.4 .  Boatwright Mary 2012. The Romans From Village to Empire. New York Oxford University Press. pp. 269279. ISBN 9780199730575.  Southern Pat 2012. Mark Antony  a life. Stroud Amberley. ISBN 9781445608631. OCLC 784578800.  Huzar Eleanor G. Mark Antony Marriages vs. Careers. The Classical Journal vol. 81 no. 2 1985 pp. 97111. JSTOR www.jstor.orgstable3296739.  Strong Anise K. July 2016. Powerful concubines and influential courtesans. Prostitutes and Matrons in the Roman World. pp. 6296. doi
10.1 0
17 CBO97813165630
83.0 04. ISBN 9781316563083. Retrieved 10 December 2019.  Gibbon Edward 1854. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Little Brown.  a b Roller The World of Juba II and Kleopatra Selene pp. 8489  Their names are unknown but it is known that all of them were killed by Nero thus descent from this line is extinct  France 1977 p. 186.  The Shards of Heaven by Michael Livingston. Publishers Weekly. Retrieved 29 January 2016.  Review The Shards of Heaven by Michael Livingston. Kirkus Reviews. 3 September 2015. Retrieved 29 January 2016. Primary sourcesedit Dio Cassius xli.liii Appian Bell. Civ. i.v. Caesar Commentarii de Bello Gallico and Commentarii de Bello Civili Cicero Letters and Philippics Orations The fourteen Philippics against Marcus Antonius  Tufts University Classics Collection Plutarch Parallel Lives Lives of the Noble Greeks and Romans Plutarchs Parallel Lives Antony  Internet Classics Archive MIT Plutarchs Parallel Lives Pompey  Internet Classics Archive MIT Plutarchs Parallel Lives Life of Antony  Loeb Classical Library edition 1920 Plutarchs Parallel Lives The Comparison of Demetrius and Antony  Internet Classics Archive MIT Josephus The Jewish War Velleius Paterculus The Roman History II.6087. Secondary sourcesedit Armstrong Karen 1996. Jerusalem  One City. Three Faiths. New York Ballatine Books. ISBN 9780345391681. Babcock C.L. 1965. The early career of Fulvia. American Journal of Philology. 86. le Bohec Yann 2001. Cesar chef de guerre Cesar stratege et tacticien Caesar the Warlord Strategy and Tactics of the Roman Republic. Rocher. ISBN 9782268038810. Borgies Loc 2016. Le conflit propagandiste entre Octavien et Marc Antoine. De lusage politique de la uituperatio entre 44 et 30 a. C. n. Brussels Latomus. ISBN 9789042934597. Bradford Ernle 2000. Classical Biography Cleopatra. Toronto The Penguin Groups. Brambach Joachim 2004. Kleopatra. Herrscherin und Geliebte Cleopatra Ruler and Mistress. Diederichs. ISBN 9783424012392. Bringman Klaus 2007. A History of the Roman Republic. Broughton Thomas Robert Shannon 1952. The Magistrates of the Roman Republic Vol. II. American Philological Association. Charlesworth M. P. Tarn W. W. 1965. Octavian Antony and Cleopatra. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. Cosme Pierre 2009. Auguste Augustus. Perrin. ISBN 9782262030209. DandoCollins Stephen 2008. Mark Antonys Heroes. John Wiley and Sons. ISBN 9780470224533. David JeanMichel 2000. La Rpublique romaine de la deuxime guerre punique  la bataille dActium The Roman Republic of the Second Punic War to the Battle of Actium. Ed. du Seuil. ISBN 9782020239592. Davis Paul K. 1999. 100 Decisive Battles from Ancient Times to the Present The Worlds Major Battles and How They Shaped History. Oxford Oxford University Press. De Ruggiero Paolo 2013. Mark Antony A Plain Blunt Man. Barnsley South Yorkshire Pen and Sword. ISBN 9781783462704. Eck Werner 2003. The Age of Augustus. Translated by Deborah Lucas Schneider. Oxford Blackwell Publishing. ISBN 9780631229575. Eyben Emiel 1993. Restless youth in ancient Rome. Psychology Press. ISBN 0415043662. France Richard 1977. The Theatre of Orson Welles. Lewisburg Pennsylvania Bucknell University Press. ISBN 0838719724. Fuller J. F. C. 1965. Julius Caesar Man Soldier and Tyrant. New Brunswick NJ Rutgers University Press. Goldsworthy Adrian 2010. Antony and Cleopatra. Yale University Press. ISBN 9780300167009. Gowing Alain M. 1992. The Triumviral Narratives of Appian and Cassius Dio. Michigan Monographs in Classical Antiquity. Ann Arbor University of Michigan Press. ISBN 9780472102945. Gruen Erich S. 1974. The Last Generation of the Roman Republic. Berkeley University of California Press. Haskell H. J. 1942. This Was Cicero Modern Politics in a Roman Toga. Classical Journal. 38 6. Hinard Francois ed. 2000. Histoire romaine des origines  Auguste The History of Rome from its Origins to Augustus. Fayard. ISBN 9782213031941. Holland Tom 2004. Rubicon The Triumph and Tragedy of the Roman Republic. London Abacus. ISBN 0349115
63 X. Holmes T. Rice 1923. The Roman Republic and the Founder of the Empire Vol. III. Huzar Eleanor G. 1978. Mark Antony A Biography. Minneapolis University of Minnesota Press. ISBN 0816608636. JalletHuant Monique 2009. Marc Antoine gnralissime prince dorient et acteur dans la chute de la rpublique romaine Mark Antony Generalissimo Oriental Prince and Player in the Fall of the Roman Republic. Presses de Valmy. ISBN 9782847720709. Jehne Martin 1987. Der Staat des Dicators Caesar The State of the Dictator Caesar. Bohlau. ISBN 9783412067861. Jones A.M.H. 1938. The Herods of Judaea. Oxford Clarendon Press. Lepelley Claude 1998. Rome et lintgration de lEmpire 44 avant J.C.  260 aprs J.C. tome 2  Approche rgionnales du HautEmpire Rome and the Integration of the Empire 44 BC  260 AD Volume 2 Regional Approaches of the Early Empire. University of France Press. ISBN 9782130487111. Lindsay Jack 1936. Marc Antony His World and His Contemporaries. London G. Routledge  Sons. Martin JeanPierre 2003. Histoire romaine Roman History. Armand Colin. ISBN 9782200265878. Mitford Terence 1980. Aufstieg und Niedergang der rmischen Welt Rise and Decline of the Roman World. Renucci Pierre. Marc Antoine un destin inachev entre Csar et Cloptre2014 ISBN 9782262037789 Rocca Samuel 2008. The Forts of Judaea 168 BC  AD 73 From the Maccabees to the Fall of Masada. Oxford Osprey Publishing. ISBN 9781846031717.permanent dead link Roller Duane W. 2010. Cleopatra a biography. Oxford Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780195365535.cite book CS1 maint multiple names authors list link Scullard Howard Hayes 1984. From the Gracchi to Nero A History of Rome from 133 BC to AD 68. London Routledge. ISBN 0415025273. SianiDavis Mary 1997. Ptolemy XII Auletes and the Romans. Historia Zeitschrift fr Alte Geschichte. Suerbaum Werner 1980. Merkwrdige Geburtstage. Chiron 10 32755. Southern Pat 1998. Mark Antony. Stroud Tempus Publishing. ISBN 0752414062. Southern Pat 2001. Augustus. London Routledge. ISBN 0415258553. Syme Ronald 1939. The Roman Revolution. Oxford Clarendon. Walker Susan 2008. Cleopatra in Pompeii. Papers of the British School at Rome. 76 3546 345348. doi
10.1 0
17 S0068246200000404. Weigall Arthur 1931. The Life and Times of Marc Antony. New York G.P. Putnam and Sons. Wilson Mark 2021. Dictator the evolution of the Roman dictatorship. Ann Arbor University of Michigan Press. ISBN 9780472129201. OCLC 1243162549. Woolf Greg 2006. Et Tu Brute  The Murder of Caesar and Political Assassination. Profile Books. ISBN 1861977417. This article incorporates text from a publication now in the public domain Chisholm Hugh ed. 1911. Antonius. Encyclopdia Britannica 
11 th ed.. Cambridge University Press. External linksedit Wikimedia Commons has media related to Marcus Antonius. M. Antonius 30 M. f. M. n. in the Digital Prosopography of the Roman Republic. Chaumont M. L. 1986. Antony Mark. Encyclopaedia Iranica Vol. II Fasc. 2. pp. 136138. MarkAntony.org Archived 6 January 2020 at the Wayback Machine Shakespeares Funeral Oration of Mark Antony in English and Latin translation Archived 26 October 2022 at the Wayback Machine The Life of Marc Antony in BTM Format Political offices Preceded by C. Caninius Rebilus C. Trebonius as suffecti Roman consul 44 BC With Julius Caesar P. Cornelius Dolabella suffect Succeeded by C. Vibius Pansa Aulus Hirtius Preceded by Sextus Pompeius P. Cornelius Dolabella Roman consul II 1 January 34 BC With L. Scribonius Libo Succeeded by L. Sempronius Atratinus v t e Works of Plutarch Works Parallel Lives Moralia De genio Socratis On the Malice of Herodotus PseudoPlutarch Lives Alcibiades and Coriolanus1 Alexander the Great and Julius Caesar life Aratus of Sicyon  Artaxerxes and Galba  Otho2 Aristides and Cato the Elder1 Crassus and Nicias1 Demetrius and Antony1 Demosthenes and Cicero1 Dion and Brutus1 Fabius and Pericles1 Lucullus and Cimon1 Lysander and Sulla1 Numa and Lycurgus1 Pelopidas and Marcellus1 Philopoemen and Flamininus1 Phocion and Cato the Younger Pompey and Agesilaus1 Poplicola and Solon1 Pyrrhus and Gaius Marius Romulus and Theseus1 Sertorius and Eumenes1 Agis  Cleomenes1 and Tiberius Gracchus  Gaius Gracchus Timoleon and Aemilius Paulus1 Themistocles and Camillus Translators and editors Jacques Amyot Arthur Hugh Clough John Dryden Philemon Holland Thomas North 1 Comparison extant 2 Four unpaired Lives v t e Julius Caesar Major life events Early life and career First Triumvirate Gallic wars Caesars civil war Crossing the Rubicon Assassination Military campaigns Mytilene Gallic Wars Arar Bibracte Vosges Axona Sabis Atuatuci Octodurus Morbihan Invasions of Britain Ambiorixs revolt Avaricum Gergovia Alesia Uxellodunum Civil War Corfinium Brundisium Ilerda Dyrrhachium Pharsalus Alexandrian war Siege Battle of the Nile Zela Ruspina Corduba Thapsus Munda Planned invasion of the Parthian Empire Legislation Lex Julia de maiestate Lex Roscia Constitutional reforms Dictator perpetuo Works Laudatio Iuliae amitae Anticato Commentarii de Bello Civili Commentarii de Bello Gallico De analogia Poems by Julius Caesar Quotes Alea iacta est Veni vidi vici Ut est rerum omnium magister usus Last words Buildings Forum of Caesar Curia Julia Basilica Julia Temple of Venus Genetrix Caesars Rhine bridges Portraits Tusculum portrait Chiaramonti Caesar Green Caesar Arles bust Family Wives Cossutia disputed Cornelia Pompeia Calpurnia Children Julia Caesarion Augustus adopted Other Gaius Julius Caesar father Aurelia mother Julia Major sister Julia Minor sister Legacy Life of Caesar by Plutarch Cultural depictions of Julius Caesar Temple of Caesar Caesars Comet Caesarism JulioClaudian dynasty Caesar title Related Julia gens Mark Antony Cleopatra Servilia Marcus Junius Brutus Curia of Pompey Category v t e William Shakespeares Antony and Cleopatra Stage adaptations The False One c.1620 All for Love 1677 Opera Antony and Cleopatra 1966 Antony and Cleopatra 2022 On screen 1908 1913 1959 TV The Spread of the Eagle 1963 TV 1972 1974 TV Zulfiqar 2016 film Related List of cultural depictions of Cleopatra Cultural depictions of Augustus Salad days Asp Thomas North Cleopatra 1912 Cleopatra 1917 Roman Tragedies 2007 Category Authority control databases International FAST ISNI VIAF 2 3 4 National Norway Spain France BnF data Catalonia Germany Israel Finland United States Sweden Japan Czech Republic Australia Netherlands Poland Vatican Artists ULAN People Deutsche Biographie Other IdRef Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleMarkAntonyoldid1222567348 Categories Mark Antony 83 BC births 30 BC deaths 
1 stcentury BC Roman augurs 
1 stcentury BC Roman consuls 
1 stcentury BC Roman generals Ancient Egyptian royal consorts Magistri equitum Roman Republic Ancient Roman military personnel who died by suicide Suicides in Ancient Rome Antonii Correspondents of Cicero Husbands of Cleopatra Husbands of Fulvia Military personnel of Julius Caesar People of the RomanParthian Wars Populares Ptolemaic dynasty Roman people of the Gallic Wars Suicides by sharp instrument in Egypt Tribunes of the plebs People of Caesars civil war People of the War of Mutina Hidden categories CS1 maint numeric names authors list Wikipedia articles needing page number citations from May 2021 Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Use dmy dates from April 2024 Pages using infobox person with multiple parents Pages using infobox military person with embed Articles with hCards All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from March 2024 All articles with dead external links Articles with dead external links from March 2024 Articles with permanently dead external links CS1 maint multiple names authors list Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the 1911 Encyclopaedia Britannica with Wikisource reference Wikipedia articles incorporating text from the 1911 Encyclopdia Britannica Commons link from Wikidata Webarchive template wayback links Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with ISNI identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with BIBSYS identifiers Articles with BNE identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with CANTICN identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with KANTO identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with Libris identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NLA identifiers Articles with NTA identifiers Articles with PLWABN identifiers Articles with VcBA identifiers Articles with ULAN identifiers Articles with DTBIO identifiers Articles with SUDOC identifiers This page was last edited on 6 May 2024 at 1750 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width